_	His participation in several other events that have embarrassed Iran—including unconfirmed reports that he provided intelligence on Iran's alleged nuclear weapons program to the United States—raise the likelihood that he will be imprisoned and/or executed if sent to Iran.
_	On learning of the British plans for "Lion", and the likelihood that new U.S. Navy battleships would be armed with guns, the Japanese decided to radically revise their plans and go one better.
_	The timing, severity of the thrombocytopenia, the occurrence of new thrombosis, and the presence of alternative explanations, all determine the likelihood that HIT is present.
_	Those with a high score may need to be treated with an alternative drug while more sensitive and specific tests for HIT are performed, while those with a low score can safely continue receiving heparin as the likelihood that they have HIT is extremely low.
_	The psychiatrist "based this conclusion on the girl's lack of emotional control, her consistent low scores in areas of judgment on psychological tests, and the likelihood that she would abuse a child."
_	Reliability is the likelihood that a product will not fail within a specific time period.
_	Poldrack points out that the strength of this inference depends critically on the likelihood that a given task employs a given cognitive process and the likelihood of that pattern of brain activation given that cognitive process.
_	There are several conditions that can predispose someone to watershed stroke by increasing the likelihood that insufficient blood supply will be able to reach the brain.
_	Predictive modelling is used extensively in analytical customer relationship management and data mining to produce customer-level models that describe the likelihood that a customer will take a particular action.
_	In addition, the involvement of lactation consultants in the prenatal visits of low-income women increases the likelihood that they will breastfeed.
_	Some parts of the country have limited connections to the Russian unified energy system, reducing the likelihood that new companies will enter the energy supply market by importing energy from neighboring energy systems.
_	In turn, ε-nets and ε-approximations, and the likelihood that a random sample of large enough cardinality has these properties, have important applications in machine learning, in the area of probably approximately correct learning.
_	Similarly, in assessing the likelihood that tossing a coin will result in either a head or a tail facing upwards, there is a possibility, albeit remote, that the coin will land on its edge and remain in that position.
_	Thompson responded that he had no apology for recruiting players from poor families if they had talent and did not take into account the likelihood that they would stay for a full four years when he recruited them, adding that he believed that Georgetown University contributed positively to their lives even if they left before graduating.
_	Repairs with undue tension have been shown to increase the likelihood that the hernia will recur.
_	Wild's first version of the Fortitude South plan was produced in early January 1943 and aimed to counter the likelihood that the Germans would notice invasion preparations in the South of England.
_	One may assume that the likelihood that satisfaction of this type appears willi increase if the person has to react to something unusual that awakens his or her mindfulness, and will decrease in situations in which the person reacts automatically and habitually".
_	"Infectivity" describes the likelihood that the disease will be transmitted during a single sexual encounter.
_	The NLRB requires unions to establish clear procedures and to follow those procedures in order to minimize the likelihood that the union would use a hiring hall procedure to exclude non-members or those out of favour with the union from the workplace.
_	Such decisions will be based on the contracting officer's assessment of past performance and the likelihood that such performance will continue.""
_	Causality assessment is used to determine the likelihood that a drug caused a suspected ADR.
_	In a distress termination, where the plan does not have enough money to pay all benefits, the employer must prove severe financial distress – for instance the likelihood that continuing the plan would force the company to shut down.
_	Even though some series such as "Hanaukyo Maids" were not initially licensed, AnimeSuki kept them from being listed because of the likelihood that Geneon would secure the rights to it.
_	In response to this complication, Mars Exploration Program manager Fuk Li stated, "Realistically, we have run through the most likely possibilities for re-establishing communication, and we are facing the likelihood that the amazing flow of scientific observations from "Mars Global Surveyor" is over."
_	However, some of these case reports involve infants but do not correct for the normal elevation of AFP in infants, while others ignore the likelihood that teratoma (and other germ cell tumors) may in fact be mixed tumors containing elements of endodermal sinus tumor.
_	The modern locality receives its name "′Arab al-Mulk" as a result of its settlement by Bedouin ("'Arab") and the likelihood that the village was part of the imperial holdings ("mulk") of various Ottoman sultans (16th-early 20th centuries) who owned vast swathes of territory along the Syrian coastline.
_	The agency noted that sea surface temperatures continued to be favorable for above-average hurricane activity, and due to the likelihood that El Nino would not develop during the peak of the season, there was a reduced likelihood of a below-average year.
_	Spliceman is an online genomic identification tool used to predict the likelihood that a mutation within a DNA sequence is linked with genetic disease.
_	A 2017 study in the "Journal of Public Economics" found that more intense immigration enforcement increased the likelihood that US-born children with undocumented immigrant parents would live in poverty.
_	They are also the only known Roman gold mines in Britain, although it does not exclude the likelihood that they exploited other known sources in Devon, North Wales, Scotland and elsewhere.
_	Daniels moves out of her apartment with Klute's help, though her voiceover with her psychiatrist reveals her fear of being able to adapt to domestic life and the likelihood that the doctor will "see me next week".
_	These properties define the rhizosphere of roots and the likelihood that plants can directly compete with neighbors.
_	Problems include "inflict[ing] significant human costs on the populations of target states, including on innocent civilians who have little influence on their government's behavior" and "increasing the likelihood that the sanctioning state will ultimately resort to force.
_	Unlike the chicks of other species, northern gannet chicks do not move about the nest or flap their wings to ask for food: this reduces the likelihood that they will fall from the nest.
_	First, the prey dilution effect lowers the likelihood that one particular individual will be eaten because of the large number of other individuals that are in the area.
_	Because sugars are associated with both metabolism and the genetic code, two of the most basic aspects of life, it is thought the discovery of extraterrestrial sugar increases the likelihood that life may exist elsewhere in our galaxy.
_	Nevertheless, it is critical to note that both chapters are found in all full manuscripts of the composition, which increases the likelihood that they have always been part of the composition.
_	A wide range of psychological operations techniques are used to increase the likelihood that citizens of the target country will be sympathetic.
_	A landmark three-year study of 129 patients at 22 major medical centers, called REMATCH (Randomized Evaluation of Mechanical Assistance for the Treatment of Congestive Heart Failure) and published in November 2001, found that the HeartMate VE (vented electric) more than doubled the likelihood that terminally ill heart-failure patients would be alive at the end of one year, and it increased the likelihood of survival for two years to 22.9% vs. 8.1% for patients who were treated with only medication.
_	More than 3 million homeowners face the likelihood that their endowment policy, when it matures, will be worth too little to pay off the mortgage.
_	These services range from phase-one and phase-two environmental site-assessments – research designed to assess the likelihood that a property is contaminated and subsurface exploration conducted to identify the nature and extent of contamination, respectively – up through the design of processes and systems to remediate contaminated sites for the protection of human health and the environment.
_	By familiarizing them with human contact, he increased the likelihood that they would approach human habitation seeking food, and cause a confrontation in which humans would kill them.
_	The Kinsey Institute denies this charge, though it acknowledges that men who have had sexual experiences with children were interviewed, with Kinsey balancing what he saw as the need for their anonymity to solicit "honest answers on such taboo subjects" against the likelihood that their crimes would continue.
_	However, Darwin is not advocating genocide, but clinically predicting, by analogy to the ways that "more fit" varieties in a species displace other varieties, the likelihood that indigenous peoples will eventually die out from their contact with "civilization", or become absorbed into it completely.
_	On February 11, 1865, he was commissioned as an assistant adjutant with the rank of captain and served in the last weeks of the American Civil War as part of General Ulysses S. Grant's immediate staff, a position which sharply reduced the likelihood that he would be involved in actual combat.
_	This predicts the likelihood that a customer can be saved at the end of a contract period (the change in churn probability) as opposed to the standard churn prediction model.
_	In general, a history of structural heart disease markedly increases the likelihood that the tachycardia is ventricular in origin.
_	There is also evidence that the promise to deploy peacekeepers can help international organizations bring combatants to the negotiation table and increase the likelihood that they will agree to a cease-fire.
_	The antagonizing of a subtype of receptor for Neuropeptide Y caused the opposite effects- it decreased the likelihood that a fearful memory would be forgotten.
_	This leads to the likelihood that Ahlen was one of the 18 biggest towns in Westphalia, at that time.
_	In the textile industry, it allowed for production at much higher speeds while lowering the likelihood that threads would break.
_	Using these curves, the analyst can then estimate the likelihood that an operator will take the correct action, as required by a given stimulus (e.g. pressure warning signal), within the available time window.
_	After multiple previous miscarriages, Mickey fears the likelihood that something gravely wrong could happen to their child.
_	The interview wrapped up with a discussion of how Circumcision reduces the likelihood that you will contract HIV by 60% in heterosexual populations.
_	Men's tendency to self-report the likelihood that they would commit sexually violent acts has also been found to increase after exposure to sexist humor, as reported by researchers from the University of Kent.
_	The final conceptual measure that Price offers is the idea of the "mavericity" of a scientist, or the likelihood that an individual will test new and unique combinations of theories and experiments unexpected in the current literature.
_	Meander cutoffs can also be formed by humans; by removing a beaver dam, the likelihood that meander cutoff channels will be formed downstream increases.
_	The majority of conference participants concurred on the superiority of the scale over the 2005 Gleason grading system, pointing to the likelihood that overtreatment could be avoided for patients whose cancer was assigned a 1.
_	The shorter barrel of the M4 carbine (with a 1:7 twist) generates lower muzzle velocity, reducing the likelihood that the bullet will upset (yaw, fragment, or expand) in the target and resulting in less significant wounds.
_	Some fault diagnostic algorithms estimate the likelihood that a node is responsible for the failure by including a probability rating for each fault candidate listed.
_	A volatility level refers to the likelihood that a specific event will impact the markets.
_	Sell-side users of Ansarada Rooms can view an AiQ Bidder Engagement Score that assigns a numerical value to the likelihood that each potential bidder will make an offer.
_	A press release from the governor's office stated, "[A]n overwhelming body of evidence indicates the 23-year-old Arridy was innocent, including false and coerced confessions, the likelihood that Arridy was not in Pueblo at the time of the killing, and an admission of guilt by someone else."
_	One of the advertising's central roles is to create both brand awareness and brand image, in order to increase the likelihood that a brand is included in the consumer's evoked set or consideration set and regarded favourably.
_	If a human source who has provided reliable political information submits a report on the technical details of a missile system, the source's reliability in political matters only generally supports the likelihood that the source understands rocket engineering.
_	Long-term avoidance of triggers increases the likelihood that the affected person will develop a disabling level of PTSD.
_	Evidence for this proposition can be found in an analysis of Ramirez (2013), who shows that “an increase of one percentage in the share of congressional district labour force in manufacturing is associated with a 19.6% increase in the likelihood that the district legislator will label China a ‘currency manipulator’”
_	The Supreme Court of California reversed the trend exemplified by "Oyster" in the seminal case "Intel v. Hamidi" (2003), reaffirming the need for a demonstration either of actual interference with the physical functionality of the computer system or of the likelihood that this would happen in the future.
_	Stigma and discrimination persist and many people living with HIV hide their status for fear of losing their jobs, social status, and the support of their families and communities, thus decreasing the likelihood that they will receive proper treatment and increasing the chances of HIV spreading undetected.
_	This increases the likelihood that the investors will receive the cash flows to which they are entitled, and thus enables the securities to have a higher credit rating than the originator.
_	"Saimiri annectens" is described as more primitive than "Saimiri fieldsi" from the same fauna, further increasing the likelihood that the latter is a lineal ancestor of modern squirrel monkeys.
_	To increase the likelihood that students will build effective ties with one another during the course, instructors should use similar assignments for students across different locations to overcome the influence of co-location on relationship building.
_	A CSR program can persuade governments and the public that a company takes health and safety, diversity and the environment seriously, reducing the likelihood that company practices will be closely monitored.
_	The Sulston score is an equation used in DNA mapping to numerically assess the likelihood that a given "fingerprint" similarity between two DNA clones is merely a result of chance.
_	This random interval reduces the likelihood that two or more nodes waiting to transmit will simultaneously begin transmission upon termination of the detected transmission, thus reducing the incidence of collision.
_	The RBER characterizes the likelihood that a given bit will be erroneous but will not be detected as such
_	The researchers found that tail-flagging decreased the likelihood that rattlesnakes would strike and increased the likelihood that they would move away from that area.
_	Shortly after the stroke, Todd Stroger gave noncommittal responses about the likelihood that his father would remain on the ballot.
_	Parents who may displace their anger, insecurity, or a persistent need to dominate and control upon their children in excessive ways have been proven to increase the likelihood that their own children will in turn become overly aggressive or controlling towards their peers.
_	It is also worth noting that in the case of natural gas, in which the afore mentioned contaminants are an issue, on-line analyzers routinely measure the water dew point at line pressure, which reduces the likelihood that any heavy hydrocarbons, for example, will condense before water.
_	In some cases coma can give the brain an opportunity to heal and regenerate, but, in general, the longer a coma, the greater the likelihood that the person will remain in a vegetative state until death.
_	Over a period of 8 days, the wasp larva consumes the roach's internal organs in an order which maximizes the likelihood that the roach will stay alive, at least until the larva enters the pupal stage and forms a cocoon inside the roach's body.
_	The ESRB's reversal of its earlier decision dramatically increases the likelihood that "Manhunt 2" – the most violent game to date produced for the interactive Nintendo Wii platform – will be marketed and sold to children.
_	Other findings included that participating in the workforce and working as a supervisor decreased the likelihood that an individual would select a woman as their best friend.
_	In studies to determine how many submarines would be needed to support the United States' strategic nuclear force, the United States Navy looked at the number of missiles required to be at sea and on station at any given time, the number of missiles each submarine should be armed with, the likelihood that a submarine will remain undiscovered by the enemy and be capable of launching its missiles, and how the maintenance schedule of each submarine will affect that boat’s availability to be deployed on mission.
_	In 2004, a study was published by LDS researchers which used statistical analysis to determine the likelihood that a chiastic structure in LDS works appeared by chance as opposed to being created deliberately.
_	Distinguishing between these types of dependencies can be important, in part because if one fails to do so, the likelihood that semantic, morphological, and/or prosodic dependencies will be mistaken for syntactic dependencies is great.
_	Highly related individuals are more closely related, and more clonal, whereas less related individuals are less so, increasing the likelihood that an individual in a population of low relatedness may have a detrimental mutation.
_	If failures occur at random and the vast majority of nodes are those with small degree, the likelihood that a hub would be affected is almost negligible.
_	Instead, the enemy must agree to cede the territory in a peace treaty, and the likelihood that they'll agree to terms is determined by how much territory the player controls and how well their units fared in battle.
_	Prior treatment with targeted therapy using Braf inhibitor vemurafenib (Zelboraf) did not affect the likelihood that melanoma patients would experience an objective response.
_	When measuring human diversity, a diversity index exemplifies the likelihood that two randomly selected residents have different ethnicities.
_	This reflects the views of the market on the relative solvency of the various countries and the likelihood that the debt will be repaid.
_	Programmes are chosen, from proposals that cover the entire range of mathematical sciences and their applications, by a Scientific Steering Committee of mathematicial scientists solely on their scientific merit and the likelihood that they will have significant impact in their subject.
_	Group I introns function as part of selfish elements, where they reduce the likelihood that the element will negatively impact the fitness of the host by interrupting a protein-coding gene.
_	Adult males exploit infants and use them to reduce the likelihood that other males will threaten them.
_	John M. Darley and Bibb Latané started this line of research, showing that contrary to common expectations, larger numbers of bystanders decrease the likelihood that someone will step forward and help a victim.
_	Given the likelihood that significant genetic exchange between human populations will continue, it is highly unlikely that humans will split into multiple species through natural evolution.
_	Calling for a state of emergency increases the likelihood that the U.S. Department of Transportation would give the city money from a "quick release" funding account.
_	The authors were careful to test a large number of animals and to include many replications, and they designed their experiment so as to rule out the likelihood that changes in response patterns were caused by different starting places for r.
_	The World Bank works with the Lao government to improve public financial management practices and increase transparency in order to increase the likelihood that revenues will be used to benefit the poor, including through investment in health and education.
_	An altruistic punishment account suggests that rejections occur out of altruism: people reject unfair offers to teach the first player a lesson and thereby reduce the likelihood that the player will make an unfair offer in the future.
_	Data scrubbing reduces the likelihood that single correctable errors will accumulate, leading to reduced risks of uncorrectable errors.
_	Toyota elected to change the MR2 suspension and tires to reduce the likelihood that this would occur, though many drivers would lament the change and claim that it "neutered" the sharp edge the MR2 was known for.
_	A subsequent study by the researchers, in 2009, found that screening appeared to increase the likelihood that adolescents would receive treatment if they were at risk for mental health disorders or suicide.
_	The general scheme in these projects is that a small number of computations are parsed to, or sent to be calculated on, a computer, generally a home computer, and then that computer analyzes the likelihood that a specific protein will take a certain shape or conformation based on the amount of energy required for that protein to stay in that shape, this way of processing data is what is generally referred to as distributed computing.
_	This both maximises the solid angle subtended by the lens, and hence the angular variation of the light intercepted, and also increases the likelihood that only a single crystal will be viewed at any given time.
_	Bicycling infrastructure has an impact on the perception of risk and safety which may impact the likelihood that people will commute by bicycle.
_	By taking steps to properly secure the pool, it lessens the likelihood that the superstructure will be damaged or compromised by freezing water.
_	Allen suggests that the purpose of recognizing faces has its roots in the "parent-infant attraction, a quick and low-effort means by which parents and infants form an internal representation of each other, reducing the likelihood that the parent will abandon his or her offspring because of recognition failure".
_	The next stage is to select a middle-level event in the situation and using each of the bottom level influences, assess the weight of evidence, also known as the ‘balance of evidence’; this represents expert analysis of the likelihood that a specific state of influence or combination of the various influences is existent within the considered situation.
_	If it becomes clear that the company does not expect to make profits in future years, the value of the tax asset has been "impaired": in the estimation of management, the likelihood that this tax loss can be utilised in the future has significantly fallen.
_	Having multiple severe sunburns increases the likelihood that future sunburns develop into melanoma due to cumulative damage.
_	According to a 2009 Cochrane review, methadone maintenance treatments decreased the likelihood that heroin dependent patients would use heroin, but did not change crime or mortality rates.
_	Since Cdc4 only has one recognition site for these phosphorylated residues it was suggested that as the amount of phosphorylation increases, it exponentially increases the likelihood that Sic1 is recognized and degraded by Cdc4.
_	Given the severity of impact to be expected and given the likelihood that some level of important disruptions in living conditions will occur for great numbers of people due to climate change events, this group contends that there is sufficient convergence among ethical principles to make a number of concrete recommendations on how governments should act, or identify ethical problems with positions taken by certain governments, organizations, or individuals.
_	Experiments and observational studies show that making an option a default increases the likelihood that it is chosen; this is called the default effect.
_	Sending data beforehand reduces the likelihood that a busy passage can send a large amount of information that overwhelms the transmission link.
_	His refusal disappointed Jefferson, who had hoped that the likelihood that the legislature would consider land legislation would attract Mason to Richmond.
_	It was learned that suppression of fire in certain ecosystems may in fact increase the likelihood that a wildfire will occur and may increase the intensity of those wildfires.
_	The problem then arises as to how to evaluate the likelihood that certain steps would follow.
_	Despite the high production quality from Digital Manga Publishing, Brienza felt that the recommended retail price would reduce the likelihood that people would buy it.
_	The inability to identify the split attention leads individuals to overestimate the likelihood that their peers will perceive them poorly.
_	Several experiments have documented an interesting, unexpected example of social influence, whereby the mere knowledge that others were present reduced the likelihood that people helped.
_	Given the resulting “immunogenicity score” of a protein, and taking into consideration other determinants of immunogenicity as described above, it is possible to make an informed decision about the likelihood that a protein will provoke an immune response.
_	One represents the likelihood that a subgroup of a specific size will emerge; the other is the probability that it will persist.
_	The following January, Nunn was sentenced to 292 months in federal prison by U.S. District Judge William Gritzer, who agreed to a higher sentencing guideline after considering Nunn's long history of drug trafficking and the likelihood that he used a firearm during drug deals.
_	In his conversations with contestants, Marx would at times direct their exchanges in ways to increase the likelihood that someone would use the secret word.
_	Congress may only have wanted to increase the likelihood that these funds would be spent inside the United States.
_	An insurance underwriter's job is to evaluate a given risk as to the likelihood that a loss will occur.
_	This is in contrast to homophily, the likelihood that individuals are to surround themselves with those they share similarities with.
_	On 10 April 2012 the European Court of Human Rights published its decision to allow the extradition of the five men from Britain to the US to face terrorism charges, in spite of the evidence presented to the Court about the US prison system's treatment of terrorism cases in the United States Penitentiary, Florence ADX, in particular Muslims and psychologically disturbed prisoners, and the likelihood that if convicted the men would be placed under the controversial regime of solitary confinement not used in the UK.
_	Brown agreed with Purdey only in as far as the potential for manganese to be a risk factor, increasing the likelihood that BSE or another prion disease would occur.
_	Each day an initial decision is made as to the likelihood that the conditions for the day are adequate to remain aloft.
_	Tubman's dangerous work required tremendous ingenuity; she usually worked during winter months, to minimize the likelihood that the group would be seen.
_	The committee enlargement was supported by the new Democratic president, John F. Kennedy, and it was expected to enhance the likelihood that civil rights bills could clear that committee.
_	Movement adds concussive force to weight, increasing the likelihood that a poorly built leg will buckle under the strain.
_	As it had in the original trial, the prosecution case had rested in part on the likelihood that two shoeprints below a window of the Nicarico home belonged to Hernandez or Cruz.
_	Zambiasaurus was named after the country of origin Zambia and Zambiasaurus submersus means the likelihood that the species drowned.
_	In considering the likelihood that the accused will attempt to influence or intimidate witnesses, or conceal or destroy evidence, court takes into account the following:
_	Several studies have tried to determine the likelihood that a user of LSD, not suffering from known psychiatric conditions, will experience flashbacks.
_	This means that the Gaussian distribution is a conjugate prior for the likelihood that is also Gaussian.
_	It may be reduced to reflect the likelihood that there would have been a fair dismissal even if a fair process had been fully followed.
_	As the function of the trait is no longer beneficial for survival, the likelihood that future offspring will inherit the "normal" form of it decreases.
_	The deployment of the airborne early warning systems, together with the Zaslon PESA radar on MiG-31 and Myech radar on Su-27 interceptors, all three "look-down/shoot-down" radars, reduced the likelihood that the low-altitude AGM-86B would reach its target.
_	Floristic Quality Assessment was originally developed in order to assess the likelihood that impacts to an area "would be irreversible or irretrievable...enabling planners, land managers, applied ecologists, and other practitioners to make standard comparisons among various open land areas, to set conservation priorities, and to monitor site management or restoration efforts."
_	Piranhas will travel to their nesting sites in shoals in order to reduce the likelihood that any single individual will be attacked by a predator.
_	In determining the amount of the loan, the pawnshop owner also assesses the likelihood that the customer will pay the interest for several weeks or months and then return to repay the loan and reclaim the item.
_	For instance, an inspiratory "whooping" sound on coughing almost doubles the likelihood that the illness is pertussis.
_	A number of similar cases followed until, in "Intel v. Hamidi", the Supreme Court of California held that a plaintiff must demonstrate either actual interference with the physical functionality of the computer system or the likelihood that such interference would occur in the future.
_	If a rat becomes aware of a predator before the predator is aware of the prey, freezing can reduce the likelihood that the prey will be detected.
_	Further exploration by the Israel Antiquities Authority in the 21st century suggest the likelihood that Horbat Sheikh Gharbawi (Horbat Ha-Gardi) is the family tomb of the Maccabees, or marking the alleged tomb in the Byzantine era.
_	Kainate receptors have a subtle role in synaptic plasticity, affecting the likelihood that the postsynaptic cell will fire in response to future stimulation.
_	Specifically, he marshalled a long list of past writers and saints (including Francisco Suarez and Jean-Joseph Surin) in order to demonstrate that the "Guide"’s principal thesis – that in order to pass to the state of contemplation one must leave behind meditative practices (even though, aware of the focus of the writings of Ignatius of Loyola on meditation, and the likelihood that Jesuit writers would react poorly to any perceived attack on Ignatius’s thought, he was quick to emphasise that these are certainly an important stage of the spiritual life) – was a well-established part of church doctrine.
_	These calculation tools provide, respectively, an early warning capability and an assessment of the likelihood that minimum light requirements for seagrasses will be maintained.
_	Moreover, certain provisions within the NFIP increase the likelihood that flood-prone properties will be occupied by the people least likely to be in a position to recover from flood disasters, which further increases demand for aid.
_	In other words, epistemic modality concerns an estimation of the likelihood that (some aspect of) a certain state of affairs is/has been/will be true (or false) in the context of the possible world under consideration.
_	This decreases surface area, increases osmotic fragility, and increases the likelihood that these cells will be captured and destroyed by the spleen.
_	The E/I ratio is related to the concept of conductance, which measures the likelihood that a random walk on a subgraph will exit that subgraph.
_	After being heated, cells develop resistance to heat, which persists for about three days and reduces the likelihood that they will die from direct effects of the heat.
_	An additional complication to these discussions are the likelihood that huge pterosaurs such as "Q. northropi" could have made long, transcontinental flights, suggesting that locations as disparate as North America and Europe could have shared giant azhdarchid species.
_	A consequence of this psychological pressure to act in a certain way is the likelihood that despite an individual's personality, they will act in a certain manner.
_	This substantially decreases the likelihood that a bomb (other than a bunker buster) can harm the structure.
_	Care should be taken, however, to ensure that deals are accurately valued, taking into account all considerations, such as relationship value, time value of money and the likelihood that the other party will live up to their side of the bargain.
_	That double determination significantly increases the likelihood that the sentence is a reasonable one."
_	As a result, the likelihood that a significant number of Austrian police officers would consider engaging in corrupt practices as a way of making a living is minimal, and rather acts of police corruption tend to be committed episodically.
_	As this represented the other major customer for Blue Water, and also the likelihood that other potential customers such as Turkey and Italy would then follow this American path, the sales prospects for Blue Water became bleak.
_	US citizenship and years spent in the United States were positively associated with geographic mobility into different neighborhoods while co-ethnic contact and prior experiences of ethnic discrimination decreased the likelihood that Latino immigrants would move from their original neighborhoods and into non-Hispanic White census tracts.
_	Using previous results on how neural activity is known to translate into fMRI or EEG signals, one can take the measured signal and determine the likelihood that model parameters have particular values.
_	With significant habitat loss, plants become ever more isolated, lessening the likelihood that pollinators will travel from male to female plants.
_	While the high density of networks within the city weakens relations between individuals, it increases the likelihood that at least one individual within a network can provide the primary support found among smaller and more tightly-knit networks.
_	In December 2010, Dr Jan Wright, the Parliamentary Commissioner for the Environment, issued a report, “Lignite and climate change: The high cost of low grade coal”, which criticised the lignite conversion proposals for their carbon intensity, their contribution to climate change and the likelihood that they would be eligible to receive a free allocation of carbon credits under the New Zealand Emissions Trading Scheme.
_	The seal increases the likelihood that a writing system existed as well as a 260-day calendar during this time period.
_	They should be kept in a specific-pathogen-free environment to increase the likelihood that the animal has not developed natural antibodies against the bacterial carbohydrates present in the serum (which can be obtained from a different animal).
_	Using electroencephalographic (EEG) data collected with a disposable headset, "BrainScope One" objective biomarkers both predict the likelihood that a patient's structural brain injury would be visible on a CT scan and assess the likelihood of brain functional impairment by comparing the patient's brain function to that of non-head injured iindividuals.
_	He decided to stay after discussing with the Superintendent the likelihood that his height would prevent serving at sea as an unrestricted line officer, hurting his naval career, and might make it impossible for him to be commissioned at all.
_	"M"1 can be interpreted as one minus the likelihood that a random pair of samples will belong to the same category , so this formula for IQV is a standardized likelihood of a random pair falling in the same category.
_	The falsified procedural background was presumably taken as a measure that would legitimatize the constitution, and increase the likelihood that the U.S. government would approve Deseret's bid for statehood.
_	Fractional flow reserve (FFR) is a technique used in coronary catheterization to measure pressure differences across a coronary artery stenosis (narrowing, usually due to atherosclerosis) to determine the likelihood that the stenosis impedes oxygen delivery to the heart muscle (myocardial ischemia).
_	Marcus Ethridge, an emeritus professor of Political Science at the University of Wisconsin–Milwaukee, argues in a 2011 policy analysis published by the libertarian Cato Institute that the US Constitution was designed to foster gridlock in order to increase "the likelihood that policies will reflect broad, unorganized interests instead of the interests of narrow, organized groups."
_	It is much less acceptable for 4WD vehicles, because 4WD vehicles have twice as many wheels with which to lose traction, increasing the likelihood that it may happen.
_	Scientists cannot predict changes to the climate with much certainty — but they can anticipate the likelihood that they will occur.
_	This increases the likelihood that the user will trip over or run into obstacles, or have other distance-related problems.
_	A 2017 study in the "Journal of Public Economics" found that more intense immigration enforcement increased the likelihood that US-born children with undocumented immigrant parents would live in poverty.
_	This reflects the likelihood that if the victim dies, other factors will have contributed to the cause of death, breaking the chain of causation; and also means that the responsible person does not have a charge of murder "hanging over their head indefinitely".
_	The psychiatrist "based this conclusion on the girl's lack of emotional control, her consistent low scores in areas of judgment on psychological tests, and the likelihood that she would abuse a child."
_	Radiation may be used to treat stage II seminoma cancers, or as adjuvant (preventative) therapy in the case of stage I seminomas, to minimize the likelihood that tiny, non-detectable tumors exist and will spread (in the inguinal and para-aortic lymph nodes).
_	Oropharyngeal airways are indicated only in unconscious people, because of the likelihood that the device would stimulate a gag reflex in conscious or semi-conscious persons.
_	For example, a 'powerful' actor can take options away from another's choice set; can change the relative costs of actions; can change the likelihood that a given action will lead to a given outcome; or might simply change the other's beliefs about its incentive structure.
_	Despite the likelihood that the water is not clean, many people fish in the river downstream from Uijeongbu.
_	Realising the likelihood that Harper's murderer had travelled on the M1 motorway prior to disposing of her body in the river, and that he would have had to refuel his vehicle as he made this journey, officers from both West Yorkshire and Nottinghamshire Police questioned staff and motorists at all service stations on the M1 motorway between Woolley, West Yorkshire and Trowell, Nottinghamshire, asking whether they had noted anything unusual on 26 or 27 March.
_	Data is encoded in NRZI format, and a linear feedback shift register is used to scramble the data to reduce the likelihood that long strings of zeroes or ones will be present on the interface.
_	Depending upon the age at diagnosis, and the disease characteristics, the likelihood that a screen detected cancer has been over diagnosed can vary from below 5% to more than 75%.
_	The main question in analysing coordinated effects should be whether the merger materially increases the likelihood that firms in the market will successfully coordinate their behaviour or strengthen existing coordination.
_	The reproductive cycle varies between paired shrimps and isolated hermaphrodites and it is possible that using both strategies enhances the likelihood that fertile eggs will be available when the ephemeral water body in which they live dries up.
_	Probability is the likelihood that a risk event will occur, and impact is the significance of the consequences of the risk event.
_	This program is based on research conducted by the Harvard School of Public Health, which illustrates that preventing youth access to lethal means of suicide, such as firearms, reduces the likelihood that a young person will die from suicide.
_	The seriousness of the offense with which a suspect may be charged also bears on the likelihood that he will flee and escape apprehension if not arrested immediately.
_	This increases the likelihood that the conference will not be able to provide enough teams to meet its tie-in obligations.
_	The likelihood that the particle will pass through the barrier is given by the transmission coefficient, whereas the likelihood that it is reflected is given by the reflection coefficient.
_	The eagle's size made it convenient for use in international transactions, and, faced with the likelihood that most being struck were exported, the Director of the Mint Elias Boudinot ended its production in 1804.
_	But both are wrong in inferring that their exposure to their respective risk factors (violent media, cigarettes) has not causally increased the likelihood that they and people around them will one day suffer the consequences of that risky behavior.""
_	The Florida judge refused to grant the subpoena, given the likelihood that Burge would exercise his 5th amendment right.
_	Modifying ricin may sufficiently lessen the likelihood that the ricin component of these immunotoxins will cause the wrong cells to internalize it, while still retaining its cell-killing activity when it is internalized by the targeted cells.
_	The spread is generally wave-like, but modified by the likelihood that nearby towns and cities will adopt the feature before the more rural parts in between.
_	The man's distress, fear and the likelihood that he would be summarily deported left Dudley uneasy about the interaction and prompted him to investigate further.
_	FIN 48 an interpretation of FASB 109 requires companies to analyze the technical merits of their tax positions and determine the likelihood that these positions will be sustained if they were ever examined by the taxing authorities (or litigation).
_	Analysis of the test results afterwards by the Ordnance Board suggested the likelihood that 30–70% of shells would not have passed the standard penetration test specified by the Admiralty.
_	"Influence" measures the likelihood that someone will act upon the user's posts, and "Outreach" measures the user's tendency to share other people's content.
_	An independent panel of scientific and engineering experts was commissioned by Frank Press, who was the Science Advisor to president Carter and the chairman of the OSTP, to evaluate the evidence and determine the likelihood that the event was a nuclear detonation.
_	Master bargaining also reduces the likelihood that employers will refuse to bargain or seek to whittle away at unionization workplace by workplace.
_	Alcohol myopia has been shown to increase the likelihood that a person will engage in risky behavior.
_	A case where a judge was satisfied that there was "evidence of a real and present danger that jury tampering would take place", and "notwithstanding any steps (including the provision of police protection) which might reasonably be taken to prevent jury tampering, the likelihood that it would take place would be so substantial as to make it necessary in the interests of justice for the trial to be conducted without a jury" may also be conducted without a jury.
_	Investors are generally most attracted to those new companies distinguished by their strong co-founding team, a balanced "risk/reward" profile (in which high risk due to the untested, disruptive innovations is balanced out by high potential returns) and "scalability" (the likelihood that a startup can expand its operations by serving more markets or more customers).
_	Actuarial models and associated tables, such as the MnSOST-R, Static-99, and SORAG, have been used since the late 1990s to determine the likelihood that a sex offender will re-offend and thus whether he or she should be institutionalized or set free .
_	So by behaving altruistically, an organism reduces the number of offspring it is likely to produce itself, but boosts the likelihood that other organisms are to produce offspring.
_	Nevertheless, owing to the "off-balance" structure of possible results, relative to possible rolls of two dice (21 possible results, 36 possible dice rolls), the likelihood that someone rolling a 62 (the numeric median result) will be beaten by a subsequent roller is only about 39 percent, while someone rolling a 54 (the statistical, or actual, median result) is facing exactly even odds.
_	He was clear about the devastating impact of their use on the environment, and warned of the likelihood that they were harmful to animals and humans as well as plants.
_	Interest in repartnering is only one factor in determining the likelihood that a widow or widower will establish a new romantic relationship.
_	Some analysts actually wagered that Fields chances in the election might be helped by the likelihood that many of Foster's supporters would go duck hunting on election day.
_	For his testimony, Wells conducted an experiment to examine the likelihood that all three of the witnesses would pick the defendant out of a lineup.
_	Fasold took a different approach, concentrating on pre-biblical literature and, as a nautical engineer, recognized the likelihood that it was made, like other ancient large boats and rafts, of reeds.
_	Water infiltration and poor ventilation increases the likelihood that moisture will be an issue in a home, which can lead to infestation of pests and to mold growth, known triggers of allergies and asthma.
_	Conditions in the pest risk analysis area can then be compared with conditions in areas where the pest survives, and in areas where the pest is known not to be able to survive, so as to assess the likelihood that the pest will establish in the pest risk analysis area.
_	What this means, is that we are adding up the likelihood that, given "k" draws from a distribution, two of them differ by "r", and the remaining "k-2" draws all fall between the two extreme values.
_	Moore was less concerned about the Cremation of Care ceremony than with the likelihood that club members with corporate interests would gain influence in government.
_	A measure of the likelihood that two associates of a node are associates.
_	In a 2005 episode of "Larry King Live" in which Bill Maher was being interviewed by Larry King, Maher argued that "if you have a flu shot for more than five years in a row, there's ten times the likelihood that you'll get Alzheimer's disease."
_	With egg freezing, they will have a frozen store of eggs, in the likelihood that their eggs are depleted at an early age.
_	The U.S. Supreme Court has held that true threats are not protected under the U.S. Constitution based on three justifications: preventing fear, preventing the disruption that follows from that fear, and diminishing the likelihood that the threatened violence will occur.
_	In determining the ease and expense of document retrieval, factors that are relevant include accessibility taking into account developments in hardware or software systems accessible; the location of the relevant electronic documents; the likelihood of locating relevant data; the cost of recovering and disclosing documents; the likelihood that electronic documents will be materially altered in the course of recovery, discovery or inspection; the availability of documents from other sources; and the significance of documents likely to be found.
_	As Rubin puts it: ""Dragon" toys with the likelihood that religion is nothing more than mass hysteria, a force so powerful that even the fabricator of an object of veneration can be taken in by it".
_	Deborah Rhode argues that contrary to the claims of some men's rights activists, research shows that joint legal custody does "not" increase the likelihood that fathers will pay child support or remain involved parents.
_	A chest wall injury can make coughing painful, increasing the likelihood that secretions will accumulate in the airways.
_	The Chinese stood firm, and refused to withdraw substantial garrisons of Chinese regular troops from Sơn Tây, Bắc Ninh and Lạng Sơn, despite the likelihood that they would be shortly engaged in battle against the French.
_	The seven trenches dug led to the discovery of three blocks of Miocene limestone (the rock from which U Nativu was cut) proving the likelihood that several stones were cut in very ancient times.
_	Because of the likelihood that a widow would be dependent on her husband, and not the other way around, Rehnquist argued that such a justifiably rational basis is permissible under the Fifth Amendment for the purpose of aiding administrative functions.
_	The final Beach Boys release describes a protagonist agreeing to come to the rescue of his "fairy tale girl" who is "driftin' on some Chinese junk" (a double entendre for both heroin and a type of ship), despite the likelihood that she will "break [his] heart one more time" — concluding that "I broke her fall and I always will."
_	The more these conditions are fulfilled, the greater the likelihood that the decisions reached are morally correct.
_	However, the observer can work out other information, such as the likelihood that the third ball came from each of the urns.
_	Over the last few decades there has been an emphasis on the development and refinement of science-based practices to increase the likelihood that released fish will survive (e.g. See research by Steven J. Cooke).
_	When local freelance photographer Lennart Wennberg (who attended the crash scene the following morning), was asked in a later interview about the likelihood that black ice caused the accident, he said it was 'out of the question' because the road was dry and the temperature around , above the freezing point of .
_	On the evening of December 27, 1864, six members of Burke's Battalion deserted and made their way into the Union lines, where they reported the presence of the former prisoners and the likelihood that they would not resist any Union attack.
_	This in turn increases the likelihood that parties will reach their instrumental goals, and enhance the ability to find integrative gains.
_	The committee determined that the paper still advanced the field of technical analysis and investor sentiment, so a revised version of the paper was released, and the MTA changed the way that the award is reviewed in order to increase the likelihood that a committee member would be familiar with prior work in the field that is not necessarily widely published or cited.
_	Another 2017 study found that the presence of oil reduced the likelihood that a democracy would be established after the breakdown of an authoritarian regime.
_	what is the likelihood that the judge would excuse his behavior and let him off because of how he was raised?"
_	That extra burn time of the second stage reduced its fuel reserves, so that the likelihood that there was sufficient fuel to reach the planned orbit above the space station with the secondary payload dropped from 99% to 95%.
_	The unusual alignment of Dörrebach’s municipal limit in the area of the "Lehnmühle" (mill) bolsters the likelihood that there was once a hamlet there named Hedisweiler ("Hidewilre"), which sometime about the 16th century passed to Schöneberg.
_	It is the inadequate supply of legitimate opportunities that constrains the ability for the individual to pursue valued societal goals and reduces the likelihood that using legitimate opportunities will enable them to satisfy such goals (due to their position in society).
_	Instead, it would complicate them by increasing the likelihood that any agreed-upon sentence reflects more the skill of defense counsel and the prosecutor's policies than the real conduct underlying the offense.
_	The Cochrane review (2015) recommends for children "L. rhamnosus" or "Saccharomyces boulardii" at 5 to 40 billion colony forming units/day, given the modest number need to treat and the likelihood that adverse events are very rare.
_	This increases the likelihood that the Mac and Windows versions of a game will launch concurrently or nearly so, as many obstacles inherent in the third-party porting process are avoided.
_	The pursuit of the breakaway was delayed to allow riders involved in the crash, or who stopped to help their colleagues, to rejoin the peloton, thus increasing the likelihood that Voeckler, less than a minute and a half behind in the general classification, would take over the race leadership.
_	In the case of the NIE's reporting on Iraq's development of an unmanned aerial vehicle (UAV), however, the Committee found that the reporting generally was not well-supported by the underlying intelligence, and overstated what was known concerning the likelihood that the Iraqi UAVs were intended for use as a delivery means for biological weapons.
_	Members of groups are at reduced risk of predation, despite the increased conspicuousness of a group, through improved vigilance, predator confusion, and the likelihood that the predator will attack some other individual.
_	A "contributing factor" is one which increases the likelihood that the sequence of factors will continue but is not essential to the damage.
_	Determining whether a disease is serious is a matter of judgment, but generally is based on whether the drug will affect such factors as survival, day-to-day functioning, or the likelihood that the disease, if left untreated, will progress from a less severe condition to a more serious one.
_	According to Kleffman, Vonage's use of these multiple domain names reduced the likelihood that Emails were filtered out as spam.
_	But a few steps, based on the recognition that the intelligence-policy relationship is indeed broken, could reduce the likelihood that such a breakdown will recur."
_	This increases the likelihood that the patient, physician, and care team will receive the results quicker, which allows for better immediate clinical management decisions to be made.
_	Additionally, the removal of foliage and other ground cover increases the likelihood that seeds will come in contact with the soil and germinate.
_	If the team’s characteristics are highly correlated, faultlines become stronger, increasing the likelihood that sub-teams will develop.
_	Barit served on the Board of AMC until 1956 when he resigned in protest over the likelihood that Hudson would be phased out of production.
_	Other accounts imply the likelihood that Crull may have been a dilettante and eccentric who had the means to follow his interests and who may not have paid his fees to the Royal Society with regularity since he may not have attached a great significance to being listed yearly.
_	By leveraging a richer media, interlocutors develop stronger affective bonds which mitigates the likelihood that one speaker will try to deceive another.
_	According to RTD (2012), when new development occurs near stations, it increases the likelihood that residents and workers will choose transit as their transportation mode.
_	By increasing the substrate concentration, the rate of reaction will increase due to the likelihood that the number of enzyme-substrate complexes will increase; this occurs until the enzyme concentration becomes the limiting factor.
_	TBI may lead to the excessive release of glutamate and other excitatory neurotransmitters (those that stimulate brain cells and increase the likelihood that they will fire).
_	This was in the knowledge that, with the recording schedule and the likelihood that re-takes would not be possible, it would have to be left in.
_	With Bibb Latané, Dabbs investigated helpfulness, finding that a larger number of persons on an elevator reduced the likelihood that someone would help a person who dropped coins or pencils.
_	Mott, facing the likelihood that he will soon serve a prison sentence for refusing to be drafted into the Vietnam War, borrows money from Sandra to gamble, hoping to raise the money to pay for his mentally handicapped twin brother, Paulie, to stay in a care facility while he is incarcerated.
_	To increase the likelihood that gates would be adequate, the minimum entry for a game was increased to 1s but remained at 6d for women, children and any uniformed members of the armed forces.
_	Pessimism bias is an effect in which people exaggerate the likelihood that negative things will happen to them.
_	Given the need to open up the Scheldt to Antwerp and the likelihood that Dunkirk would be of limited use as a supply port as a result of its demolition, the major Canadian units were redeployed.
_	This reduces the likelihood that two different inputs will be encoded by the same hidden units and weights, and so will decrease the chance of interference.
_	Finally, S – 'Satisfaction' – is added to suggest the likelihood that a customer might become a repeat customer, provide positive referrals or engage in other brand advocacy behaviors following purchase.
_	Mortgage lending will also take into account the (perceived) riskiness of the mortgage loan, that is, the likelihood that the funds will be repaid (usually considered a function of the creditworthiness of the borrower); that if they are not repaid, the lender will be able to foreclose on the real estate assets; and the financial, interest rate risk and time delays that may be involved in certain circumstances.
_	This increases the likelihood that the peptide will find the groove.
_	Heseltine was permitted by his colleagues to explore the option of elected city mayors, although it did not meet with Cabinet approval; other ministers were concerned at the likelihood that cities would elect Labour mayors or that there might be deadlock between mayors and local councils.
_	Not only does this mean that guards who are guilty of sexually harassing inmates go unpunished, it also decreases the likelihood that women will report harassment.
_	Both George Harrison and Ringo Starr temporarily left the group at various points during 1968 and 1969; by 1970, all four members had begun working on solo projects, for they all realised the likelihood that the band would not regroup.
_	Probability is the measure of the likelihood that an event will occur.
_	In response to this commission, the FCC initiated a race-neutral regulatory policy to increase the likelihood that African Americans would be employed with a broadcaster.
_	However, the likelihood that one shark was involved is contested.
_	In 1911, Prime Minister Paul Eyschen commissioned an engineer to evaluate Germany's western railroad network, particularly the likelihood that Germany would occupy Luxembourg to suit its logistical needs for a campaign in France.
_	This decreases the likelihood that the private sector will be willing to engage into the rural water sector.
_	Following standard color and shape conventions increases the likelihood that the pictogram and sign will be universally understood.
_	Females utilize paternity confusion to reduce the likelihood that a male she has mated with will kill her offspring.
_	This increases the likelihood that seeds will remain underground instead of being ejected from the nest.
_	This process creates many redundant paths through which the message may flow increasing the likelihood that the message will be received by all participants and adding to the survivability of the system.
_	A model program was implemented at Kingsborough Community College to help low-income, high-need students draw down untapped benefits such as food stamps, health care, child care and tax credits – because access to basic resources increases the likelihood that a young person will be able to stay in college and obtain a degree, leading to higher earning potential.
_	TPP increases the likelihood that Japan will undertake economic reforms to revive its economy, which coupled with potential South-Korean accession to the TPP, might have an economic impact on China.
_	Dr. Michael Roman of the University of Maryland Center for Environmental Science stated "traces of oil in the zooplankton prove that they had contact with the oil and the likelihood that oil compounds may be working their way up the food chain".
_	The study also concluded that SNAP increases the likelihood that participants will consume whole fruit by 23 percentage points.
_	When team members are able to speak up and get involved (voice), the likelihood that many of them will exercise leadership increases greatly.
_	Despite the number of recent military coups in Africa, Dacko publicly dismissed the likelihood that Bokassa would try to take control of the country.
_	The program is led by Tony (Wass Stevens), a gruff man that insists that Ava take the program seriously as to do otherwise would just raise the likelihood that the demon would return, as repossessions will frequently happen.
_	Other scholars question the likelihood that the Proposed Convention will have any effect on the prevention and punishment of crimes against humanity.
_	Thus, the longer that peacekeepers remain in a country, the greater the likelihood that peace will maintain.
_	Knowledge of the distributions can be used to determine the likelihood that one parameter exceeds another, and by how much.
_	The DMCA also provides safe harbor for digital service providers whose users are suspected of copyright infringement, thus reducing the likelihood that the providers themselves will be considered directly infringing.
_	Providing at least one soldier in every squad with some ALS training and equipment (focusing on time-sensitive battlefield trauma such as arterial bleeding and blocked airways) creates a company-level organic reserve of trained auxiliary medical personnel, ensures the fastest response time to a wounded soldier on the battlefield and has been statistically proven to reduce the likelihood that a soldier will die while waiting for a battalion medic to arrive.
_	Additionally, the illegal immigration debate in the US has resulted in some businesses refusing to hire such workers based on the likelihood that they would be fined and litigated against.
_	He discusses the importance of the large number of newly introduced infectious diseases and the likelihood that these played a far more significant role in the Native American decline than warfare or other actions by Europeans.
_	With significant habitat loss, plants become ever more isolated, lessening the likelihood that pollinators will travel from male to female plants.
_	PageRank estimates the likelihood that a given page will be reached by a web user who randomly surfs the web, and follows links from one page to another.
_	Many agents were not impressed by the event, but still believed the project would eventually open, despite industry experts and Donald Trump questioning the likelihood that the project could obtain financing for construction.
_	It has been argued that such reference class problems can be solved by finding which features are relevant: a feature is relevant to house price if house price covaries with it (it affects the likelihood that the house has a higher or lower value), and the ideal reference class for an individual is the set of all instances which share with it all relevant features.
_	Put another way, the likelihood that any particular sub-system will fail (or experience a particular event) can be called its criticality.
_	They broadly agree that Lee had a group of escaped slaves recaptured, and that after recapturing them he hired them out off of the Arlington plantation as a punishment; but they disagree over the likelihood that Lee flogged them, and over the charge that he personally whipped Mary Norris.
_	A widely cited proposal from Sunstein and Thaler urges that healthier food be placed at sight level in order to increase the likelihood that a person will opt for that choice instead of less healthy option.
_	The growth of development teams increased the likelihood that software bugs would appear, as code produced by programmers working in different teams was merged into a whole.
_	On 29 January 2013 her preselection was endorsed by the ALP executive 19 votes to 2, meaning her name was placed first on the ALP's senate ticket in the Northern Territory, supporting the likelihood that she would become Australia's first female Indigenous federal parliamentarian.
_	During Geoffrey's term of office as Chancellor Walter de Coutances served as his "seal-keeper"; the need for someone to perform this function adds further evidence to the likelihood that Geoffrey's time as Chancellor was spent on unrelated duties for his father.
_	As the predominant customer for reference designs are OEM's, many reference designs are created by technology component vendors, whether hardware or software, as a means to increase the likelihood that their product will be designed into the OEM's product, giving them a competitive advantage.
_	A widely cited proposal from Sunstein and Thaler urges that healthier food be placed at sight level in order to increase the likelihood that a person will opt for that choice instead of less healthy option.
_	Many businesses were permitted to stay in the flood plain, but houses and motels were either raised or moved due to the likelihood that a flood would occur while a person may be sleeping.
_	This increases the likelihood that they will show psychological problems.
_	Three years after the application was received, the FCC chose to dismiss the application, presumably under the likelihood that granting the station nighttime power would cause interference to WTIC in Hartford, Connecticut and KRLD in Dallas, Texas; also broadcasting on this same frequency.
_	Furthermore, a dangerous environment inherently provides infanticide threats to female mice, increasing the likelihood that corticosterone concentrations will increase, while maternal care toward offspring decreases.
_	However, such a use of the matrix is limited by the likelihood that the musicians on stage would be disturbed by any changes made to the channel levels by the front of house operator.
_	Often propagandists will create a persona that is "reliable, trustworthy and credible" to the target audience which increases the likelihood that the message is believed and influences the audience's actions and perspectives.
_	However, PTA duration may be linked to the likelihood that psychiatric and behavioral problems will occur as consequences of TBI.
_	The recognition of Kandori, Mailath & Rob (1993) and Young (1993) was that if the rule to update one's strategy allows for mutation, and the probability of mutation vanishes, i.e. asymptotically reaches zero over time, the likelihood that the risk dominant equilibrium is reached goes to one, even if it is payoff dominated.
_	Officers see advantages of giving warnings as having less paperwork, enabling officers to use their time more efficiently, and reducing the likelihood that the officer will have to appear in court.
_	That value may be regarded as the relative probability the event will happen, expressed as a fraction (if it is less than 1), or a multiple (if it is equal to or greater than one) of the likelihood that the event will not happen.
_	Behavioural mutations play a detrimental part towards the genomes of many species, however they can greatly affect the outcome of mating; affecting the success of fitness, how many offspring will arise and the likelihood that the male will actually procreate.
_	However good buying agents do not make any profit from the registration fee; the main purpose of the fee is to increase the likelihood that the client is sincerely committed to the purchase; in case they were not they would lose the registration fee after a certain length of time.
_	Reliability refers to the likelihood that a given operationalized construct will yield the same results if re-measured.
_	The decoder is therefore able to output extrinsic information, formula_18 about the likelihood that a certain code bit stream was transmitted.
_	Family background or one’s socioeconomic status affects the likelihood that students will graduate from high school or college, what type of college or institution they will attend, and how likely they are to graduate and complete a degree.
_	He warned the Parliamentary Antimafia Commission presided by Luciano Violante in February 1993 of the likelihood that further attacks were being planned by the Corleonesi on the mainland.
_	African bees are more vulnerable to less predictable times of scarcity or attack and it is therefore to their advantage to produce as many young as possible, increasing the likelihood that some or even many will survive.
_	This effectively prevents germination unless a flash flood disturbs the area and deposits enough water to increase the likelihood that seedlings will be able to establish deep enough roots to survive the dry season.
_	Roughly speaking, in operant conditioning, an operant is actively emitted and produces changes in the world (i.e., produces consequences) that alter the likelihood that the behavior will occur again.
_	"The New York Times" ran the story in a broader piece detailing the likelihood that key members of the IRA and Sinn Féin were marked for death, and the story was heavily covered by the Irish press which used the episode as an effective propaganda tool.
_	Information provided by the Federal Trade Commission and the National Association of Attorneys General, and information collected from telephone billing has found that requiring the entry of credit card information will decrease the likelihood that a customer will enter a transaction by a factor of 3 or 4.
_	Accordingly, the likelihood that the H5N1 virus would actually mutate to become transmissible in humans is unknown; however, researcher Derek Smith created an evolutionary model to show that this is possible.
_	Instead, the law faculty had simply held a straw poll to determine the likelihood that he would receive tenure: the vote was 10-5 in favor, which meant that five professors believed that Mr. Bradford had a low probability of doing so.
_	If the auditor believes there is substantial doubt about the entity's ability to continue as a going concern for a reasonable period of time, he should obtain information about management's plans that are intended to mitigate the effect of such conditions or events, and assess the likelihood that such plans can be effectively implemented.
_	They strategically played "Fatshe leno la rona" as the last song – which in theory would increase the likelihood that the audience would remember the tune – while having their organisers add words of praise for it in an attempt to sway the crowd's opinion in favour of that hymn.
_	Physicist Ali Alousi, for instance, criticized it as unmeasurable and questioned the likelihood that thoughts can affect anything outside the head.
_	Third, Sowell is highly critical of William Bowen and Derek Bok, former university presidents of Princeton and Harvard, whose 1998 book "The Shape of the River" caused quite a stir when it revealed how race-sensitive admissions policies increased the likelihood that blacks would be admitted to selective universities and that upon graduation these students were more likely to become leaders of community and social service organizations.
_	(b) the likelihood that the young person will comply with a non-custodial sentence, taking into account their compliance with previous non-custodial sentences; and
_	Economic risks is the likelihood that economic management will cause drastic changes in a country's business environment that hurt the profit and other goals of a business enterprise.
_	This team conducts a comprehensive inspection that includes carrier's aircraft, training facilities, crew qualifications, maintenance procedures, quality control practices and financial status to maximize the likelihood that the carrier would safely perform for Department of Defense.
_	This further stigmatizes condom use and lowers the likelihood that people engaging in sexual acts will use them.
_	He also discovered many techniques for increasing the likelihood that a trance state would occur.
_	The government of former Prime Minister Tony Blair had pledged to hold a public referendum to decide on membership should "five economic tests" be met, to increase the likelihood that adoption of the euro would be in the national interest.
_	Greeno (1994) also suggested that affordances are "preconditions for activity," and that while they do not determine behavior, they increase the likelihood that a certain action or behavior will occur.
_	Although the Mint Bureau was very busy in the booming economy of the 1920s, numismatic historian Roger Burdette points out that there were flaws in operations—for example, Philadelphia Mint officials, instead of setting aside gold coins from each batch delivered for inspecting and testing by the annual Assay Commission, took all assay coins from a bag set aside at the start of the year, increasing the likelihood that nonstandard coins would go undetected.
_	Alice and Bob have agreed an integer, "k", which sets the computational burden on Alice and the likelihood that she should succeed by chance.
_	On December 19, 2016, the Department of Education announced its decision to cut off Charlotte School of Law from access to student loans, due to the school's "non-compliance with the fundamental standards set by its accreditor" and its "substantial misrepresentations to current and prospective students regarding the nature and extent of its accreditation and the likelihood that its graduates would pass the bar exam".
_	The case arose following the 2011 redistricting plan for the State of Wisconsin created by Republican legislators to maximize the likelihood that the Republicans would be able to secure additional seats in the State legislature over the next few election cycles.
_	Together these parties identify issues in the field of workplace safety and health that require immediate attention based on the number of workers affected, the seriousness of the hazard, and the likelihood that new safety information and approaches can effect a change.
_	Although HD 189733b with atmospheric temperatures rising above 1,000 °C is far from being habitable, this finding increases the likelihood that water, an essential component of life, would be found on a more Earth-like planet in the future.
_	Various risk factors increase the likelihood that an elderly person will become a victim of elder abuse, including an elderly person who:
_	As the financial health of banks and other institutions deteriorated due to losses related to mortgages, the likelihood that those providing the insurance would have to pay their counterparties increased.
_	The head of the team investigating the escape, Mohammed Tahir, further cemented the likelihood that there was complicity from a number of people.
_	After running the voice sample through the program, a percentage from 0 to 100 is generated as far as the likelihood that the two voices are the same.
_	He is serving his sentence at United States Penitentiary, McCreary in McCreary County, Kentucky; He was also sentenced to two years' supervised release, but this was largely academic given the likelihood that he will die in prison.
_	indicating the likelihood that the pose represents a favorable binding interaction and ranks one ligand relative to another.
_	Since random noise can be expected to appear to have faint periodic signals embedded in it, statistical analysis is required to determine the likelihood that a detected signal actually represents a genuine signal.
_	The debate was originally scheduled considering the likelihood that no candidate would clinch the Republican nomination before March 15, due to the overall size of the field.
_	Due to this, the "cumulative investigator rate," that is, the likelihood that unique investigators are funded over a 5-year window, has declined from 43% to 31%.
_	A high consumption of omega-6 polyunsaturated fatty acids, which are found in most types of vegetable oil including soybean oil, may increase the likelihood that postmenopausal women will develop breast cancer.
_	In particular, based on the historical accuracy of Blue Chip forecasts made since the late 1970s, the likelihood that the average unemployment rate in 2010 could be at least as high as in the alternative more adverse scenario is roughly 10 percent.
_	It provides an estimate of the likelihood that a borrower will be unable to meet its debt obligations.
_	Most web filtering companies use an internet-wide crawling robot that assesses the likelihood that a content is a certain type.
_	The home's year of construction can be a clue as to the likelihood that lead is present in its paint.
_	Political risks are the likelihood that politicalforces will cause drastic changes in a country's business environment that hurt the profit and other goals of a business enterprise.
_	The main advantages of this method are its simplicity (making it ideal for short-handed crews), and the fact that the boat does not need to be maneuvered far away of the casualty (which reduces the likelihood that the crew may lose visual contact).
_	This normalization of sex work would relieve the stress many dancers experience increasing the likelihood that they will be open about their work.
_	A common misconception about the MX preference ordering is that it is intended to increase the likelihood that mail may be delivered; however, merely having multiple MX records with the same preference provides this benefit.
_	The more popular a film is, the higher the likelihood that the original negative is in a worse shape, due to the need to return to the original camera negative to strike new interpositives to replace the exhausted ones, and thus create more internegatives and release prints.
_	This in turn enhances the likelihood that fiscal policies will have positive economic, social and environmental impacts.
_	Sunstein suggests that granting standing to animals, actionable by other parties, could decrease animal cruelty by increasing the likelihood that animal abuse will be punished.
_	The Condit Family Association's (CFA) 1885 & 1916 genealogy books, "Genealogical Record of the Condit Family,Descendants of John Cunditt" by Jotham H.Condit & Eben Condit, indexed nearly all descendants of John ("John the Norman Ancestor") as Condit, making a brief reference to other surname spelling variations by others (Cundit, Cunditt (John's will) Cundict & Conduit); this includes the two Condit genealogy book authors' own surname for John, the ancestor, found as Cunditt, in a Trenton, NJ will that John, the Norman ancestor, signed with his "mark", and not his signature in 1709 (some 30 years after coming to America in 1678) that raises questions as to the likelihood that John probably learned English by then, and could have signed his will with his name; Questions are raised as to it being highly unlikely a son and father would have differing surnames (Cunditt and Cundit), as the will was written by someone else for Peter and John.
_	Mulattoes also had a higher incidence of manumission, most likely because of the likelihood that they were the children of a slave and an owner.
_	However, he has claimed that the reason he chose Simeon was due to his perception of the likelihood that he could achieve team success on the basketball court (as measured in championships).
_	Viquesney's 1936 list shows "2 Doughboys, 2 Sailors", reinforcing the likelihood that Viquesney's "2+2" brochure claim was a typo, since all four statues (the two "standard" "Doughboy"s, the "Sailor", and a variant design "Doughboy"), were all dedicated at Palatka on November 11, 1927, according to newspaper articles.
_	Normality tests assess the likelihood that the given data set {"x", …, "x"} comes from a normal distribution.
_	In other words, a person's residential location is a substantial factor shaping the likelihood that that person will become involved in illegal activities.
_	Without diligence in managing nuclear knowledge, substantial portions of it could be lost due to personnel retirements and the likelihood that much of it could be disused or discarded as a result of either negligence or changing priorities.
_	Risk factors are those conditions which increase the likelihood that an infant will be born with or develop an infection.
_	This allows us to calculate the new unnormalized probabilities state vector formula_28 through Bayes rule, weighting by the likelihood that each element of formula_23 generated event 1 as:
_	However, PIIE analysts note that research shows that the presence of "sticks" (a possible suspension of trade benefits) and "carrots" (technical assistance) in trade deals increase the likelihood that labor obligations in trade deals have a positive effect; there are both sticks and carrots present in TPP.
_	Towards the end of that time, he was approached by the Australian Democrats political party to fill a casual vacancy in the Senate, but decided against it, partly due to the likelihood that this could place him in direct conflict with his brother if Peter became Treasurer.
_	This reduces the likelihood that the fixture will fail, interrupting the operation and potentially causing damage to infrastructure, components, or operators.
_	The doctrine recognized the likelihood that one side or the other might try to seize Yugoslav territory as a forward staging area, to ensure lines of communication or simply to deny the territory to enemy forces.
_	The expedition's commanders believed a further attempt was not practicable, and after further reconnaissance they wrote home to Pitt suggesting that no assault was now possible, raising the likelihood that the force should sail for home.
_	In addition, an increase in neurons' excitability may accompany loss of inhibitory neurons that normally serve to reduce the likelihood that other neurons will fire; these changes may also produce PTE.
_	In case of confirmation of this information, the likelihood that material may go missing or be destroyed during the relocation of the archives, is high enough.
_	The book also notes the likelihood that English children, whilst they might find the Celtic scales and intervals difficult at first the "trouble involved will be amply repaid by the widening of their musical horizon, and by the more deeply poetical influence which Keltic music will exert upon the young mind".
_	An HIV vaccine is a vaccine that would be given to a person who does not have HIV, in order to confer protection against subsequent exposures to HIV, thus reducing the likelihood that the person would become infected by HIV.
_	Overestimation of such pleasure, and its duration, increases the likelihood that the good will be consumed.
_	"The change in investment strategy represents an effort on the part of PBGC to increase the expected returns on its assets and to diminish the likelihood that taxpayers will be called on to cover some of its liabilities.
_	However, Wittel and Wu's testing has been criticized due to the minimal header information that was present in the emails they were using; most Bayesian spam filters make extensive use of header information and other message metadata in determining the likelihood that a message is spam.
_	A 2018 study in the "Economic Journal" found that "that a 10% increase in immigration from exporters of a given product is associated with a 2% increase in the likelihood that the host country starts exporting that good ‘from scratch’ in the next decade."
_	The document further underlined that NATO's forces should be able to conduct a variety of missions, from high to low intensity, and emphasized the likelihood that NATO will need to carry out a greater number and range of smaller operations.
_	They weighed the likelihood that it would decay more quickly if shown against the desirability of making a unique object visible and the inevitability of its eventual degradation.
_	The LSAT is a standardized test in that LSAC adjusts raw scores to fit an expected norm to overcome the likelihood that some administrations may be more difficult than others.
_	This reduces the likelihood that pathogens will be carried either by air or foot traffic from a raw production area to Mount Pleasant's ready-to-eat production.
_	Password strength is the likelihood that a password cannot be guessed or discovered, and varies with the attack algorithm used.
_	In some cases, fences will transport the stolen items to a different city to sell them, because this lessens the likelihood that the items will be recognized.
_	Another tactic used by some fences is to retain stolen items for some time before selling them, which lessens the likelihood that the burglary victims or police will be actively looking for the items in auctions and pawnshops.
_	It was thought that there might have been a connection to the house because Austen uses the name Fitzwilliam in her novel, but following the Chancellor's Autumn Statement the Jane Austen Society dismissed the likelihood that Austen had had the house in mind, given the absence of any evidence that she had visited the estate.
_	The amount withheld from the contractor or subcontractor should be determined on a case-by-case basis by the parties negotiating the contract, usually based upon such factors as past performance and the likelihood that the contractor or subcontractor will perform well under the contract.
_	According to OMHF, "The new knowledge to be gained from the proposed study would contribute to our theoretical understanding of the origins of sexual offending against children, because it would help identify factors that influence the likelihood that someone with a sexual attraction to children will act upon that attraction."
_	Despite their wealth of linebacking talent, USC linebacker Chip Banks was also under consideration, given the likelihood that he would be the best player available.
_	If an attitude object is salient to us, our vested interest will be increased as well as the likelihood that our behavior and attitudes will be consistent (Sears & Citrin, 1985).
_	Carlos and Lewis (1995) show that it managed to survive because its British investors accurately assessed the corporation's value and prospects, which included the likelihood that the Canadian government would bail out the railway should it ever default on its bonds.
_	The cabling used for the SMPTE 292 electrical interface is coaxial cable with a nominal impedance of 75 Ω. Data is encoded in NRZ format, and a linear feedback shift register is used to scramble the data to reduce the likelihood that long strings of zeroes or ones will be present on the interface.
_	[Note the likelihood that Heinrich’s father Heinrich could be that of the earlier “Heinrich de Kirchperc”]
_	Nevertheless, the increasing corruption and repression characterizing the Somoza rule and the likelihood that the Sandinistas would emerge victorious ultimately influenced Archbishop Miguel Obando y Bravo to declare formal support for the Sandinistas' armed struggle.
_	The severity of the imbalance determines the likelihood that someone develops thrombosis.
_	First, by increasing a company's exposure relative to capital, leverage raises the likelihood that a company will suffer losses exceeding its capital.
_	Deceptions in which he participated included Operation Fortitude, which sought to convince German military planners that the Allied invasion of Europe would take place in Calais, not Normandy, thereby diverting hundreds of thousands of German troops and increasing the likelihood that Operation Overlord would succeed.
_	Airports troubled by fog on a regular basis are prime candidates for Category III approaches, and including autoland capability on jet airliners helps reduce the likelihood that they will be forced to divert by bad weather.
_	However, WAFF made a controversial decision in the mid-1980s to preempt "Late Night with David Letterman" (and on Fridays, "Friday Night Videos") in favor of evangelist Jimmy Swaggart's daily half-hour program at 11:30 p.m. for several years, largely to cater to the area's conservative religious population and in the likelihood that it would bring in more money than local ad revenues would for Letterman's show; the station opted to sign off at midnight rather than tape delay the NBC shows for later airing.
_	The minimality of the triangulation is meant to increase the likelihood that such a solution exists, since heuristically one might expect the minimal triangulation to be "straightened" without causing degenerations or overlapping of tetrahedra.
_	Critics of tow-in surfing decry the noise and exhaust fumes made by PWC engines, as well as the likelihood that new participants can get into predicaments that they have not been trained or conditioned to survive.
_	The performance definition of the FICO risk score (its stated design objective) is to predict the likelihood that a consumer will go 90 days past due or worse in the subsequent 24 months after the score has been calculated.
_	In general, negative co-rumination increased the likelihood that women would binge drink weekly, versus men who would drink less weekly.
_	It is also possible to take a more principled approach to the statistics of "n"-grams, modeling similarity as the likelihood that two strings came from the same source directly in terms of a problem in Bayesian inference.
_	Hohn was hired to increase the likelihood that school doctors and nurses would allow the film to be shown.
_	Bem argued that by grouping together the bisexuals and homosexuals Bell "et al." "reduced many of the correlations and increased the likelihood that important antecedent variables would be erroneously eliminated during the recursive process of discarding the weaker correlates from successive iterations of the path model."
_	Exodus, such as the fact that its Asiatics are arriving in Egypt rather than leaving, and the likelihood that the "river is blood" phrase may refer to the red sediment colouring the Nile during disastrous floods, or may simply be a poetic image of turmoil.
_	Cobb reached the conclusion that Faubus had exaggerated the likelihood that segregationists would engage in violence in a vain bid to block desegregation.
_	Inherent risk, in a financial audit, measures the auditor's assessment of the likelihood that there are material misstatements due to error or fraud in segment before considering the effectiveness of internal control.
_	Many breastfeeding experts argue that these commercial discharge packs decrease the likelihood that a woman will breastfeed and, if she does breastfeed, the length of time she will do so.
_	Rich Barger, director of security research at Splunk, pointed out that the VIPS theory "assumes that the hacker downloaded the files to a computer and then leaked it from that computer" but overlooks the likelihood that the files were copied several times before they were leaked, potentially creating new metadata each time.
_	In December 2005, Archbishop Raymond Leo Burke declared the parish's board members and its priest, Marek Bozek, excommunicated and announced his intention to disband the parish with the likelihood that the premises would be sold.
_	Lorenz believed that the innately cute features of the infant are a preadapted characteristic that increases the individual's chance of survival and the likelihood that their genes will be passed on to further generations, similar to the innate imprinting newborn waterfowl exhibit.
_	The CoP is also turning attention to post-harvest issues such as consumption, storage, transformation, and markets to increase the likelihood that greater crop diversity will lead to better diets and livelihoods.
_	This is possible if medical treatment or medical research creates conditions that increase the likelihood that two or more diseases come together in a population.
_	(d) the likelihood that the party failing to perform or to offer to perform will cure his failure, taking account of all the circumstances including any reasonable assurances;
_	The last relationship states that knowing that the person has emphysema increases the likelihood that he will have cancer.
_	The reason for this is that having the information that the person has emphysema increases the likelihood that the person is a smoker, thus indirectly increasing the likelihood that the person will have cancer.
_	Employers may administer personnel selection tests within the scope of background checks that are used to assess the likelihood that employees will engage in dishonest behavior.
_	They compare the amount of rewards associated with each course of action and calculate the likelihood that they will receive the rewards.
_	This message also forces L to accept the impossible, including the likelihood that Shinigami exist ("The Way Things Are").
_	Research has also shown that coaching can increase the likelihood that interviewers using a structured interview will accurately choose those individuals who will ultimately be most successful on the job (i.e., increase reliability and validity of the structured interview).
_	Rutte extended another invitation to the PVV to join the VVD and CDA in coalition talks, but Wilders rejected the offer on June 29 as the CDA was unwilling to enter negotiations at the onset, instead of waiting for the VVD and PVV to conclude their talks first, extinguishing the likelihood that a right-wing VVD-PVV-CDA cabinet can be formed.
_	Priorities of the institution, such as protecting their reputation, may increase the likelihood that institutions fail to respond appropriately and take great lengths to prevent sexual assaults from surfacing, which can take the form of attempting to silence the individual.
_	However, despite a second closure vote on 21 January 1992 and negotiations with an industrial property developer to sell the site, the heliport was ultimately kept open to avert the likelihood that the city would have to repay the initial US $1.5 million FAA construction grant.
_	Their presence in a dish may increase the likelihood that the certain wines will pair well.
_	That information would help determine whether her husband and the mother had been intimate, and therefore the likelihood that the child is in fact Richard's.
_	Mathematically, the forces can be represented in a formula such as: formula_1 where p() is the likelihood that a Threat will materialize/succeed against an Asset, and d() is the likelihood of various levels of damage that may occur.
_	The intent of the truce between the kings was not to allow them to lead the crusade, but rather to improve the likelihood that they would provide assistance.
_	Reusability metrics indicate the likelihood that an artifact is reusable.
_	This decreases the likelihood that the antibodies will bind to an unwanted epitope of the antigen not found on the initial peptide.
_	At the time, Forgotston correctly predicted that Jindal's plan would fail to clear the legislature because of the higher sales taxes, the lack of needed Democratic support to offset Republican defectors, and the likelihood that the plan would not increase overall state revenues.
_	Two personality characteristics that may affect the likelihood that people can make positive use of the after-math of traumatic events that befall them include extraversion and openness to experience.
_	School officials were concerned with how white students might react to having a black peer and the likelihood that Powell Florence would find work upon completion of the program was slim.
_	In that role he served as a spokesman for NASA for planetary missions, for instance announcing the likelihood that there was once flowing water on Mars in September 2015.
_	As with the Fischer clock, the benefit of the delay clock is to reduce the likelihood that a player with positional and/or material superiority will lose a match solely because of the expiration of time on that player's time clock.
_	Chinese and Russian documents from that time reveal that Kim became increasingly desperate to establish a truce, since the likelihood that further fighting would successfully unify Korea under his rule became more remote with the UN and US presence.
_	Whole genome sequencing should not be confused with DNA profiling, which only determines the likelihood that genetic material came from a particular individual or group, and does not contain additional information on genetic relationships, origin or susceptibility to specific diseases.
_	Because people will be drawn to groups that have their close friends in them its possible to intervene with programs like Big Brothers Big Sisters of America that form dyadic relationships with people at risk of exhibiting at risk behaviors, children who participate show a noticeable reduction in the likelihood that they would exhibit negative behaviors like drug use, use of alcohol and skipping school.
_	The more these conditions are fulfilled, the greater the likelihood that the decisions reached are morally correct.
_	In considering the likelihood that release will disturb the public order or undermine public peace or security, the court takes into account the following:
_	It is a nine-item self-report instrument that tests the likelihood that an individual will get sleep disturbances following various stressful events.
_	The 1994 Air Taser Model 34000 had an "anti-felon identification (AFID) system" to prevent the likelihood that the device would be used by criminals; upon use, it released many small pieces of paper containing the serial number of the Taser device.
_	Lorraine Copeland deduced the likelihood that these pieces were Gigantolithic tools, once used by the Qaraoun culture to chop down Cedars of Lebanon to start the Neolithic Revolution.
_	Evidence suggests that people who experience low self-esteem are much more afraid that their partner is dissatisfied and being unfaithful, which again increases the likelihood that they will experience sexual jealousy.
_	In other words, one group of participants is asked to rank order the likelihood that Linda is a bank teller, a high school teacher, and several other options, and another group is asked to rank order whether Linda is a bank teller and active in the feminist movement versus the same set of options (without "Linda is a bank teller" as an option).
_	Moreover, if it can be said that if one competitor has a higher probability of winning a single game (and game results are i.i.d.), the likelihood that this competitor wins the series increases when more games are played.
_	Publishing complaints on highly visible websites increases the likelihood that the general public will become aware of the consumer's complaint.
_	Some modern researchers question the likelihood that her father, a Reform Jew, would approve his daughter's union with Behan, a man 14 years older than his daughter, an unemployed office-seeker, Gentile, and divorced father.
_	The other key reason for dispute about the origins of Rus' people is the likelihood that they had a role in ninth- to tenth-century state formation in eastern Europe (ultimately giving their name to Russia and Belarus), making them relevant to what are today seen as the national histories of Russia, Ukraine, Sweden, Poland, Belarus, Finland and Baltic states.
_	The typical finding is that participants often miss the second target item, as if there were a "blink" of attention following the first target's presentation, reducing the likelihood that the second target stimulus is attended.
_	This process, known as V(D)J recombination, is important because it increases the receptor diversity which increases the likelihood that B cells and T cells will have receptors for novel antigens.
_	The amount of pressure applied (and speed) will depend on the winemaker's preference with additional pressure increasing the likelihood that the skins and seeds of the grapes will be scoured and torn, releasing tannins and other phenolic compounds that could make the juice more astringent and bitter.
_	Woodbury currently ranks 10th among the 161 ranked colleges and universities in California in the 2017 "New York Times" "Overall mobility index" which reflects both access and outcomes, representing the likelihood that a student at Woodbury moved up two or more income quintiles.
_	More recent analysis 16s rRNA sequence data showed moderate similarity between these three genera supporting the likelihood that they may have differentiated from a common ancestor.
_	Despite the capacity for movement into early adulthood, the likelihood that the tooth will become impacted can be predicted when the ratio of space available to the length of the crown of the tooth is under 1.
_	A prescriber can do little to modify age related physiological changes when trying to minimize the likelihood that an older person will develop an adverse drug reaction.
_	After the pill forms the fabric is thinner there, increasing the likelihood that a hole will form.
_	Most of those who maintain the language are elderly, which adds to the likelihood that language extinction is near.
_	There is also no correlation between how religious someone is and the likelihood that that person will cheat.
_	Feeling empathy towards the individual needing aid increases the likelihood that the aid will be given.
_	In considering the likelihood that the accused, if released, will undermine or jeopardise the objectives of the proper functioning of the criminal justice system, including the bail system, the court takes into account the following:
_	Researchers believe that one reason for this effect is that living together increases the inertia of the relationship - i.e., the likelihood that a couple will continue to stay together vs. break up.
_	In October 1939 he delivered the Einstein–Szilárd letter to President Franklin D. Roosevelt, suggesting that nuclear-fission research ought to be pursued with a view to possibly constructing nuclear weapons, should they prove feasible, in view of the likelihood that Nazi Germany would do so.
_	The intensity of the experience increases the likelihood that participants will transfer their experience on-site back to their own communities even after the alternative break ends.
_	The results as to whether or not the amount of experience an officer has contributes to the likelihood that they will use force differ among studies.
_	Fouché suggested that Napoleon create a hereditary title to cement his legacy and lessen the likelihood that the regime would change upon his death.
_	If prophylaxis is delayed, the likelihood that alloimmunization will be prevented is decreased.
_	This move was mostly caused by recent retail developments in the area, which includes the Polo Park Shopping Centre, and the likelihood that CKY's studios were bought off by developers who would use the space for additional retail opportunities.
_	The information gathering enhances the likelihood that the events discussed will be incorporated into later abduction "memories".
_	This is often done in pregnancies with multiple gestations to increase the likelihood that one child may live a healthy life.
_	They are nevertheless an important one, since richer economies are better placed to create and maintain other well-being-enhancing conditions, such as a clean environment, the likelihood that the average person will have a right to 10 years or more of education, and lead a comparatively long and healthy life.
_	Proponents of the nonadaptive hypothesis, such as Elisabeth Lloyd, refer to the relative difficulty of achieving female orgasm through vaginal sex, the limited evidence for increased fertility after orgasm and the lack of statistical correlation between the capacity of a woman to orgasm and the likelihood that she will engage in intercourse.
_	Conclusion 3: "Prewar Intelligence Community assessments were inconsistent regarding the likelihood that Saddam Hussein provided chemical and biological weapons (CBW) training to al-Qa'ida.
_	Based on toxicological and remediation reports and NIOSH's comments on the then current state of the IMT and the likelihood that the building could not be made safe, SPC cancelled its 2005 season.
_	The level of metallicity—an astronomical term describing the abundance of chemical elements with an atomic number greater than 2 (helium)—is now thought to determine the likelihood that a star will have planets.
_	A high consumption of oxidized polyunsaturated fatty acids (PUFAs), which are found in most types of vegetable oil, may increase the likelihood that postmenopausal women will develop breast cancer.
_	Behavior prediction is to acknowledge the likelihood that a habit will form, but in order to form that habit, a goal must have been initially present.
_	They exert that "The more sensitive the domain, the greater the likelihood that motivational factors will be evoked and exert some influence on overt responses to an explicit measure".
_	The overall predation risk is a function of the abundance, activity and ability of predators to detect the forager, as well as the likelihood that the forager can escape the predator if it is not vigilant.
_	A critical question for these situations may be "How much time will operators spend looking at X relative to Y?" or "What is the likelihood that the operator will completely miss seeing a critical event?"
_	Naturally, if one knows the likelihood that they will beat their own last roll by rolling again, they also know the likelihood that someone following them will do the same.
_	Obviously, there is no difficulty in holding A liable if A had actual knowledge of the likelihood that B would be further injured by a driver.
_	The pump to bring the meltwater back to the surface must be placed below this level, and in addition, if there is a chance that the borehole will penetrate to the base of the ice, the drilling project must plan for the likelihood that this will change the water level in the hole, and ensure that the pump is below the lowest likely level.
_	Barron and Sutton attribute Bradbury's involvement in public office and in the affairs of his Company at this period to his wife's influence and to the likelihood that she was able to 'take full charge of his business in his absence', thus enabling him to devote time to these other pursuits.
_	As Cold War tensions reduced the likelihood that the great powers would achieve a sufficient level of cooperation to ensure the survival of the U.N., discretion seemed the greater part of valour.
_	University of Copenhagen researchers Rie Wallendorf and Peter B. Andersen write that the Church of Scientology in Denmark is wary of those external to the organization, and that this detracts from the likelihood that new members will join.
_	Another methodological problem is that interobserver reliability (the likelihood that the two members of the measured dyad respond similarly) is near zero for tested husband and wife couples.
_	Each failed attempt to reproduce a result increases the likelihood that the result was a false positive.
_	Self-styled taxpayer watchdog and former legislative aide C.B. Forgotston correctly predicted that Jindal's plan would fail to clear the legislature because of the higher sales taxes, the lack of needed support from Democrats, and the likelihood that the plan would not increase overall state revenues.
_	Less speculative is the likelihood that de Courcy's success was used by the Crovan dynasty, who were allied by marriage with Cenél nEógain, as a means of settling old scores.
_	Firstly a review must be undertaken to establish the likelihood that a combined authority would improve:
_	The "last great storm" is a concept attributed to William Bell by Nina Sharp in Momentum Deferred with regard to the two parallel universes and the likelihood that one, or the other of them, would be destroyed once the doorway between them was opened.
_	The state replied to the couples' motion on December 24, calling the request for expedited consideration premature given the likelihood that in January the U.S. Supreme Court will agree to hear a same-sex marriage case.
_	Firstly, the likelihood that Factortame would suffer hardship and loss, were relief not to be allowed.
_	Like many super-Earth sized planets, Proxima Centauri b could have an icy composition like Neptune, with a thick layer of hydrogen on its surface; the likelihood that this is the case has been calculated to be greater than 10%.
_	The fall of Mussolini in late July 1943 increased the likelihood that the Jews on Rab would fall into German hands, prompting the Italian Foreign Ministry to repeatedly instruct the General Staff that the Jews should not be released unless they themselves requested it.
_	LLC's owner, Hess Energy, filed a letter to the Federal Energy Regulatory Commission (FERC) surrendering the authorization to construct and operate, due to the likelihood that the terminal would not be profitable.
_	The permanent potential for sousveillance from so many (as opposed to more formalised exposés at the hands of investigative reporters, a small media elite) raises the likelihood that power abuses will be captured on record which can then be used to hold power-abusers and manipulators to account, providing of course, that there is a functioning legal system and/or public sphere (with mechanisms in place to translate popular demands and moral outrage into real-world change).
_	The close association of Seth temples with temples of Nephthys in key outskirt-towns of this "milieu" is also reflected in the likelihood that there existed another "House of Seth" and another "House of Nephthys" in the town of Su, at the entrance to the Fayyum.
_	Norman's definition of (perceived) affordances captures the likelihood that the actor will sit on the armchair and throw the softball.
_	This effect can be explained as the outside effects lead to increased destabilization and political crises (financial crisis, elite divisions, mobilization of groups sensing political opportunity) which in turn increases the likelihood that revolutionary forces will arise and act.
_	A medical example is the likelihood that a given test result would be expected in a patient with a certain disorder compared to the likelihood that same result would occur in a patient without the target disorder.
_	Landreth and Silva propose that quantitative maps of research findings will be to experiment planning in neuroscience what statistics is to experiment analyses: a tool that will help neuroscientists judge the likelihood that a series of planned experiments will contribute to the research record.
_	"Prepurchase Attribute Verifiability, Source Credibility, and Persuasion", a study by Shailendra Jain and Steven Posavac, examined the role message origin plays in the likelihood that a recipient will believe the message in an advertisement.
_	Also, but by virtue of the likelihood that this "future evolution" proves to be a "process of collectively unfolding the yet "higher stages" of the Great Chain, as it has already unfolded the lower", Wilber envisions too that ""real" religion—"genuine" spirituality and the "deep sciences" of the "interior"" could subsequently serve "an unprecedented role as the vanguard of evolution, the growing tip of the universal organism, growing toward its own highest potentials, namely, the ever-unfolding "realization" and "actualization" of Spirit [emphasis added]".
_	The pristine condition of the site and the likelihood that it will yield information about the little-known Drew Phase has led it to be assessed as highly worthy of preservation.
_	Ownership of a smartphone alone increases the likelihood that a consumer will play mobile games.
_	As in many estate settlements, Brodess's death increased the likelihood that Tubman would be sold and her family broken apart.
_	Proponents of the standard IAT argue that the Personalized IAT increases the likelihood that those taking it will evaluate the concept rather than classify it.
_	He would go on to compare the random emergence of even the simplest cell without panspermia to the likelihood that "a tornado sweeping through a junk-yard might assemble a Boeing 747 from the materials therein" and to compare the chance of obtaining even a single functioning protein by chance combination of amino acids to a solar system full of blind men solving Rubik's Cubes simultaneously.
_	While some physician took clear moral stances on the issue, others found their campaign increased the likelihood that untrained physicians would be penalized, thereby creating the potential to advance the activists' own professional goals.
_	On December 15, 2016, the Federal Trade Commission settled a US$100 million suit against DeVry, which alleged that DeVry's advertisements deceived consumers about the likelihood that students would find jobs in their fields of study, and would earn more than those graduating with bachelor's degrees from other colleges or universities.
_	Kinetic diameter is a measure applied to atoms and molecules that expresses the likelihood that a molecule in a gas will collide with another molecule.
_	Imbalances in some neurotransmitters can lead to excitotoxicity, damage to brain cells that results from overactivation of biochemical receptors for excitatory neurotransmitters (those that increase the likelihood that a neuron will fire).
_	Houseboats are very expensive in Amsterdam because of the limited number of moorings; this expense has reduced the likelihood that the approximately 2,400 families that live on the inner waters of Amsterdam will find themselves confronted by new neighbor boats.
_	This increases the likelihood that the DQ2 isoform will bind and stay bound to peptide when recognised by T-cells.
_	When the numbers of adults and larvae approach the maximum that the tree can support, antiaggregation signal chemicals, i.e., verbenone, are produced, reducing the likelihood that additional beetles will land and attack the tree.
_	If the hypothesis is not tested on a different data set from the same statistical population, it is impossible to assess the likelihood that chance alone would produce such patterns.
_	The International Union for Conservation of Nature assesses the orca's conservation status as data deficient because of the likelihood that two or more killer whale types are separate species.
_	This approach does not improve the accuracy of the mean but can significantly improve the accuracy of a filter over time by reducing the likelihood that the covariance is underestimated.
_	Under the test, "the likelihood that personal jurisdiction can be constitutionally exercised is directly proportionate to the nature and quality of the commercial activity that an entity conducts over the internet."
_	According to a 2003 study by Eliya Msiyaphazi Zulu and Gloria Chepngeno, although higher levels of education do correspond to greater knowledge about HIV/AIDS, education levels do not significantly impact the likelihood that couples will discuss HIV-related prevention strategies.
_	"Laventiana" is described as more primitive than "Saimiri (Neosaimiri) fieldsi" from the same fauna, further increasing the likelihood that the latter is a lineal ancestor of modern squirrel monkeys.
_	However, this suggestion was unsupported by any argument to discount the likelihood that spiny defenses might have been developed as a means of defense in resource-rich environments, where herbivory might have been more intense than in the hypothesized sandy environments.
_	She expresses concerns over Cora's true motivations, and the likelihood that Henry will learn that they are responsible for anything they order Mr. Gold to do now that their possession of the dagger is not a secret.
_	In August 2008, Sega confirmed that "" and "MadWorld" would not be released in Germany, due to the likelihood that they would be refused to get a rating by the USK.
_	There is also a culturally value on virginity; thus, early marriage increases the likelihood that a woman remains "pure" until marriage.
_	A discussion ensued at which Hase was present, where Warrender warned of the likelihood that many European countries would now be drawn into a war.
_	Senders exhibiting suspicious behaviour should be rate limited to reduce the likelihood that they will send spam, which may get past even a good filter.
_	They argued that this was "not only compromising filmmakers’ visions, but also greatly increasing the likelihood that adult-oriented movies are seen by the very groups for which they are not intended."
_	The peer-selection model has also been shown to result in increased access capital for female entrepreneurs; companies with female co-founders are 78% more likely to be selected than male-only companies, three times the likelihood that women entrepreneurs will receive funding through traditional venture capital.
_	Additionally, the act of postinoculation talk bolsters their attitudes and increases resistance to the message as well as increasing the likelihood that talk will generate a potentially viral effect–spreading inoculation to others through the act of vocal talk (Ivanov et al., 2012).
_	Thus the design does not adequately reduce the likelihood that the victim's heart enters into a deadly ventricular fibrillation.
_	In an editorial in late December 2010, "The Courier-Journal" questioned the potential cost to the state government of the project, including highway upgrades and the likelihood that increases to hospitality industry infrastructure would seek further subsidies.
_	Since the problem observed by a designer can always be treated as merely a symptom of another higher-level problem, the argumentative approach also increases the likelihood that someone will attempt to attack the problem from this point of view.
_	Thomas dismisses the likelihood that Drake stayed at Drakes Bay, but instead headed south.
_	Finally on 29 November, a resolution was reached which left filmmakers prepared for the likelihood that the film would be certified X regardless.
_	The research confirmed the likelihood that the introduction happened through clouds over the ocean, a phenomenon of intercontinental species dispersal previously reported for bacteria and fungi but not for an alga.
_	However, prior to Bokko's decision to disobey her orders, Shinichi is appalled at the likelihood that his friends would obey the order and runs to Koichi to ask Phoenix to intervene.
_	Clinicians and health care providers may need to rely on a more narrow definition of futile care in order to make decisions about a patient's health care, and this definition often centers around an assessment of the likelihood that a patient could physically recover as a result of treatment, or the likelihood of such treatment to relieve a patient's suffering.
_	Hays attempted to reduce studio costs (and improve the industry's image in general) by advising individual studios on how to produce movies to reduce the likelihood that the film would be cut.
_	Not only does this mean that guards who are guilty of sexually harassing inmates go unpunished, it also decreases the likelihood that women will report harassment.
_	Neritan Ceka raised the likelihood that the ancient fortifications near the modern-day Gurëzeza or Klos might have been belonging to the Balaites.
_	The presence of mosquitos to act as a vector, combined with a reservoir of infected humans, almost assured the likelihood that people in these areas would be exposed to the diseases.
_	Many slaveowners refused to use slaves for skilled labor because doing so would both increase owners' dependence on specific slaves and increase the likelihood that those slaves would run away in pursuit of self-employment elsewhere.
_	When a solitary pulmonary nodule is identified, plans for further action are made based on the likelihood that the nodule could be malignant cancer.
_	Credit scores assess the likelihood that a borrower will repay a loan or other credit obligation based on factors like their borrowing and repayment history, the types of credit they have taken out and the overall length of their credit history.
_	The Coalition declares war, and brings all its military might against the Confederation forces on Ravenette—banking on the likelihood that they will achieve victory before reinforcements arrive, and that the Confederation will agree to negotiate a peaceable parting.
_	In the third section of the book the protagonist seeks authentication of Teresa’s story, particularly Teresa’s claim that she had an affair with Guevara and the likelihood that she is the product of their affair.
_	In an article reporting Barnes' loan move to Shrewsbury Town in March 2008, BBC Sport reported the likelihood that Barnes was to be released by Manchester United in the summer.
_	New regulations expected to take effect in the new contract due in 2008 would make these temporary measures permanent, reducing the likelihood that High Rock would see lake levels that exceed below full pond again.
_	The coalition preferences of various parties played a role during the campaign, due to the likelihood that no party would get an absolute majority of seats in the House.
_	Model 33 was cancelled due to the likelihood that the "Renzan" would not be available.
_	This may be explained by the likelihood that the water level was 3 meters higher in the seventeenth century and would have lapped up against the bawn walls.
_	These guard plates are advertised to act as a protective barrier contributing to the overall longevity of the material by reducing the likelihood that a sharp object will damage the fibers.
_	Later, a Grand Jury found that the Archdiocese of Philadelphia's decision to do so "had the effect of diminishing the validity of the evaluations and the likelihood that a priest would be diagnosed as a pedophile or ephebophile."
_	Mate choice copying is said to occur when the likelihood that one individual (the "observer" or "focal individual") will mate with a particular individual (the "target") increases or decreases based upon observing a sexual interaction between the "target" and another individual.
_	He has also argued the likelihood that Eusebius got from Hegesippus the statement that St. John was exiled to Patmos by Domitian.
_	This was designed to 1) create a more level playing field in the allocation of these names, 2) increase the likelihood that these domain names will more promptly provide the mobile community with new features and services, and 3) preserve the stability and security of registry operations.
_	This section of the route could be set for major change in the future as there are plans to complete the Ashby Canal through Measham and surrounding area with the likelihood that route 63 will follow the new canal.
_	The cardiac electrophysiology study (EPS) typically measures the response of the injured or cardiomyopathic myocardium to PES on specific pharmacological regimens in order to assess the likelihood that the regimen will successfully prevent potentially fatal sustained ventricular tachycardia (VT) or ventricular fibrillation VF (VF) in the future.
_	Without legislation, it was feared that many of the large credit unions already in existence would face the likelihood that their stream of new members would slow to a trickle and, thus, their long term viability prospects diminish.
_	A Norwegian meta-analysis of 22 randomized studies involving early-stage ovarian cancer revealed the likelihood that 8 out of 10 women treated with cisplatin after the initial surgery were overtreated.
_	Using the LOD score which describes the likelihood that two genes are near each other on a chromosome, and thus will be inherited together, areas of strong or suggestive linkage with inheritance of synesthesia were found.
_	Support for this hypothesis would include evidence that individuals live in groups of closely related kin and that the release of chemical alarm signals increases the likelihood that related individuals will avoid predation.
_	The second hypothesis, predator attraction, suggests the release of schreckstoff may attract additional predators which will interfere with the predation event, increasing the likelihood that the prey will escape and survive the attack.
_	According to national research, providing inmates with education and vocational programs can reduce the likelihood that offenders will commit new offenses upon release and return to prison.
_	The documentary looks into the likelihood that cyberwarfare through Russian interference in the 2016 United States elections helped elect Trump as President of the United States.
_	Recipient interest in this type of mailing tends to diminish over time, increasing the likelihood that recipients will report graymail as spam.
_	By creating this memorable experience for the consumer, it also increases the likelihood that a consumer, or someone who interacted with the campaign will tell their friends about it and via word of mouth the product or service being advertised reaches a lot more people than initially anticipated, and means it has more of a mass audience.
_	An angry and desperate Meyers then offers his services to Duffy, who admits he only met with Meyers to influence his opponent's operation under the likelihood that either Meyers would come to work for him or be fired for taking the meeting.
_	Details later emerged which indicated the likelihood that Vreeland had obtained a baby girl from an unknown parent or parents in Boston in 1866 so that her sister could use the baby in an attempt to extort a man with whom she had had an affair.
_	As to the likelihood that these events ever took place, on the one hand there are two versions of the ten commandments story, in E (Exodus 20) and J (Exodus 34), this gives some antiquity and there may be some original events serving as a basis to the stories.
_	In each case, a choice would need to be made based upon the loan term, the current interest rate, and the likelihood that the rate will increase or decrease during the life of the loan.
_	The doctrine did recognize the likelihood that one side or the other might try to seize Yugoslav territory as a forward staging area, to ensure lines of communication, or simply to deny the territory to enemy forces.
_	Thus, given that an object is a member of category (concept) formula_1, the likelihood that it is male is formula_3.
_	Likewise, the likelihood that the object has wings and likelihood that the object is nocturnal or both is formula_4.
_	The NEA (2011) reported that, "Research indicates that in order to increase the likelihood that Gen "Y" teachers remain in the profession, they need opportunities to participate in decision making at the school and district level; a positive and supportive school culture which fosters teamwork and effective lines of communication; professional opportunities that include collaboration and technology; in-depth feedback and support from administrators and colleagues; time set aside for regular collaboration; and fair pay and a differentiated pay structure which includes rewarding outstanding performance, acquiring new knowledge and skills, and assuming new roles and responsibilities (Behrstock & Clifford, 2009)."
_	Metaplasticity is a term describing the likelihood that a given stimulus will induce neuronal plasticity, based on the previous activity experienced by that neuron.
_	Over-enthusiastic tightening increases the likelihood that the suture material cuts into skin, bearing in mind the swelling that will ensue during wound healing.
_	However, while acknowledging the likelihood that "Xing Zi Ming Chu" and the other Guodian texts circulated during Zi Si's lifetime, other scholars do not find this evidence persuasive, leaving the question of authorship open.
_	The cardiac electrophysiology study (EPS) typically measures the response of the injured or cardiomyopathic myocardium to PES on specific pharmacological regimens in order to assess the likelihood that the regimen will successfully prevent potentially fatal sustained ventricular tachycardia (VT) or ventricular fibrillation VF (VF) in the future.
_	Australian Chairman of Selectors, Andrew Hilditch, stated before the team for the match was announced: "If we play a specialist spinner, which I am pretty sure we will be, it will be Xavier", which showed the likelihood that Doherty would make his Test and Ashes debuts simultaneously.
_	Thus, the first step of establishing the likelihood that modifier genes indeed exist and contribute to observed variation is crucial to this described research process.
_	Makler's calculations show that the higher the socioeconomic class of the person, the greater the likelihood that they had left the firm.
_	Andrew Jarret cautions againsting drinking from the well today; "To drink from the well now would be sheer folly as the water has been contaminated somewhat by the copper coins thrown into it by wish-makers and there is also the likelihood that some of the local sheep population have made deposits of their own".
_	Risk is dependent on market conditions, current tenants, and the likelihood that they will renew their leases year-over-year.
_	The two properties that characterize all addictive stimuli are that they are reinforcing (i.e., they increase the likelihood that a person will seek repeated exposure to them) and intrinsically rewarding (i.e., they are perceived as being inherently positive, desirable, and pleasurable).
_	When the likelihood that a result occurred by chance alone is below a certain level, one or more asterisks are displayed.
_	She also associated men with providing food and comfort, which increased the likelihood that she would approach villages.
_	Several other risk factors increase the likelihood that a caregiver will participate in elder abuse, including a caregiver who:
_	Juror 2 questions the likelihood that the boy, who was almost a foot shorter than his father, could have inflicted the downward stab wound found in the body.
_	It theorizes that an increasing phenotypic independence corresponds to a decrease in the likelihood that a given mutation will result in an increase in fitness.
_	The U.S. Supreme Court has held that true threats are not protected under the U.S. Constitution based on three justifications: preventing fear, preventing the disruption that follows from that fear, and diminishing the likelihood that the threatened violence will occur.
_	In his early work, Conn studied numerous aspects of plasma for fusion applications, including how it can be confined with magnetic fields, thereby increasing its density and the likelihood that atomic nuclei collide and fuse.
_	Luke Heine and Cole Scanlon founded the non-profit organization to improve the likelihood that young people from any background have equal information on the college and financial aid application process.
_	He intervened in the War of Devolution and helped negotiate a peace, which increased the likelihood that Spain and France would both aid Crete.
_	The more predictable the outcome, the greater the likelihood that the actor caused the injury or loss intentionally.
_	The revised definition is expected to increase the likelihood that an entity is deemed to have control over another.
_	Separation from the community, stigma associated with time in prison, and fewer employment opportunities decrease the likelihood that ex-inmates will marry.
_	The decision to vacate the 2006 Transmission Congestion Study was made on the basis that DOE did not adequately consult with the States in the conduct of the study as required under the FPA making specific mention that "there was the likelihood that proper consultation would have produced different results."
_	In the United States, a credit score is a number based on a statistical analysis of a person's credit files, that in theory represents the creditworthiness of that person, which is the likelihood that people will pay their bills.
_	Strikes were then particularly frequent in Hornellsville, indicating the likelihood that the Brakemen's Brotherhood served a coordinating function in strike actions throughout its existence.
_	Boating is limited to paddle power, due to the likelihood that powered boats would agitate the water and cause noxious weeds to break apart and spread.
_	Furthermore, after examining the "Hand D" manuscript (widely accepted as in Shakespeare's handwriting) from the play "Sir Thomas More", Bruster opined that the speculated printers' errors could have resulted from reading a manuscript written by someone with Shakespeare's "messy" handwriting, thus bolstering the likelihood that Shakespeare wrote the Additional Passages.
_	Therefore, by reducing legal cynicism in communities, participatory justice effectively decreases the likelihood that the state will respond to this cynicism through use of overly punitive justice.
_	This strategy increases the likelihood that representative numbers of both sexes will survive.
_	Not introducing an attractive female to a mate, minimises the likelihood that poaching will occur as it is a form of indirect aggression that minimises contact between a mate and a potential threat.
_	In other words, older sperm are less likely to result in a successful pregnancy and, moreover, the cumulative fragmentation of sperm DNA over time increases the likelihood that a small fraction of men will pass on achondroplasia and transmit multiple genetic and chromosomal defects.
_	Lian Xixian asked Bayan for bodyguards, but Bayan advised that the more bodyguards Lian took with him, the more the likelihood that the Song Chinese might harm him.
_	As the number of new, external actors increases, so does the likelihood that fire will be used as a weapon.
_	A study was initiated in 2002 at Cornell University to investigate if implementation of a Medical amnesty policy increase the likelihood that students will call for help in alcohol-related medical emergencies; and increase the likelihood that students treated for alcohol-related medical emergencies will receive a brief psycho-educational intervention at the university health center as a follow-up to their medical treatment.
_	This increases the likelihood that the system can be brought to a semi-usable state in the case of a partial system failure.
_	The relative percentages depend on correlation between the likelihood that respondent n will choose alternative i, "L ", and the likelihood that respondent n will choose alternative j, "L ", over various draws of "β".
_	The Court held that the declarations in the letters tended to prove Walters’ “intention of going, and going with Hillmon,” which would make it more plausible that Walters’ “did go and that he went with Hillmon,” which in turn would increase the likelihood that the corpse and murder victim was Walters.
_	A poor spot interrupts the rhythm of a course, and increases the likelihood that a horse will rub or drop a rail.
_	What is the likelihood that creative solutions are required and that grant proposals worthy of funding will be received to address it?
_	Chicago's record number of homicides, with 56 in September 2015, has triggered "guardian-like" intervention, a method for predicting the likelihood that an individual will be involved in violence, either as a victim or perpetrator.
_	The 1431 letter discovered in Gdańsk lends further credibility to the likelihood that this first scribe was John Kempe, her eldest son.
_	The choice of KOKY was probably made to increase the likelihood that both KOKY and KPZK-FM, which also targets an African American audience, would be sold together to an African American owner; the FCC order that required the divestitures to Last Bastion strongly suggested that the trust seek out minority owners.
_	The goal of STP is simple – reducing the time it takes to process a transaction will increase the likelihood that a contract or an agreement is settled on time.
_	Bayesian methods integrate data from a wide variety of sources, including both experimental results and prior computational predictions, and use these features to assess the likelihood that a particular potential protein interaction is a true positive result.
_	Research has found that training increases the likelihood that a teacher will actually deliver skills-based prevention content, and do it in the way it was intended.
_	This problem can be minimized by the use of multiple templates, but the method is complicated by the templates' differing local structures around the gap and by the likelihood that a missing region in one experimental structure is also missing in other structures of the same protein family.
_	The relationship between emotion and memory is complex, but generally, emotion tends to increase the likelihood that an event will be remembered later and that it will be remembered vividly.
_	Bandura's research shows that high perceived self-efficacy leads teachers and students to set higher goals and increases the likelihood that they will dedicate themselves to those goals.
_	With these “altered” phenotypes increasing fitness it becomes important to look at the likelihood that adaptive maternal effects will evolve and become a significant phenotypic adaptation to an environment.
_	This increases the likelihood that a substance might have a unique profile of results and makes the tests more useful.
_	The escape risk system utilizes a metric to indicate the likelihood that an offender would attempt escape.
_	In another experiment, Bargh, Chen, and Burrows also found that because the stereotype about blacks includes the notion of aggression, subliminal exposure to black faces increased the likelihood that randomly selected white college students reacted with more aggression and hostility than participants who subconsciously viewed a white face.
_	These databases are then used by toxicologists, chemists, regulatory agencies and scientists to investigate and predict the likelihood that an organic or inorganic chemicals will cause an adverse effect (i.e. toxicity) to exposed organisms.
_	This, in turn, increases the likelihood that a female rat will engage in certain species-typical sexual activity by increasing her sexual receptivity.
_	These policymakers, like the New Deal itself and its leader, were in Wells's view not clear enough about their aims, thus increasing the likelihood that one of the "Raucous Voices" would prevail.
_	At the present, there does not seem to be support for it from a willing Palestinian partner, thus decreasing the likelihood that it would be successful in achieving peace.
_	Since "Septoria" relies on the proximity of suitable hosts, increasing the spacing of your cannabis plants and rotating crops annually will decrease the likelihood that the disease will move next door.
_	In it, he argued that profit motives were the largest factor driving American journalism, and he supported this argument with a study focusing on the likelihood that regional newspapers would reprint a story from the back of the national section of the New York Times as a function of whether or not the story focused on dogs.
_	Although HD 189733b with atmospheric temperatures rising above is far from being habitable, this finding increases the likelihood that water, an essential component of life, would be found on a more Earth-like planet in the future.
_	Though mentioning the likelihood that one source was lost Indian languages extinguished by the advance of Indo-Aryan, he concentrated on finding loans from Dravidian.
_	Furthermore, the children who do not perform to standard are being forced to repeat multiple grades, which increase the likelihood that the student will drop out by 90%.
_	However, no such signals were detected in further follow-up studies by Arecibo, nor by the Green Bank Telescope in West Virginia and the Allen Telescope Array (ATA) in northern California, as well, suggesting the likelihood that the signals detected earlier were radio frequency interference from an artificial satellite orbiting the Earth.
_	(This claim of a "solution" is disputed by experienced XZ550 forum contributors as a myth - the likelihood that residual casting sand consistently affected the performance of all the 1982 models is highly improbable.
_	Some spyware disables or even removes competing spyware programs, on the grounds that more spyware-related annoyances increase the likelihood that users will take action to remove the programs.
_	This is because the greater the number of choices, the greater the likelihood that the choice set will include the optimal choice for any given consumer.
_	The U.S. National Intelligence Council concluded in a January 2005 report that the war in Iraq had become a breeding ground for a new generation of terrorists; David B. Low, the national intelligence officer for transnational threats, indicated that the report concluded that the war in Iraq provided terrorists with "a training ground, a recruitment ground, the opportunity for enhancing technical skills... here is even, under the best scenario, over time, the likelihood that some of the jihadists who are not killed there will, in a sense, go home, wherever home is, and will therefore disperse to various other countries."
_	Vaccine viruses are chosen to maximize the likelihood that the vaccine will protect against the viruses most likely to spread and cause illness among people during the upcoming flu season.
_	Although the real risk test has no bearing on liability, the likelihood that the respondent's acts or statements pose a real risk of harm to the administration of justice may be relevant for mitigation or aggravation of the punishment.
_	Peter Anderson and his colleagues performed longitudinal studies and concluded that “alcohol advertising and promotion increases the likelihood that adolescents will start to use alcohol, and to drink more if they are already using alcohol.”
_	The CRC said Al Gore's campaign to control carbon emissions is motivated by the likelihood that he will make an "immense fortune" if laws are passed to control them; argues that organized labor is bad for America; and has criticized government efforts to weaken intellectual property protection of prescription medications.
_	If the bird arrives with sufficient time to recover these expended resources and lay their clutch with enough time to hatch at the period that prey density is going to be at its best, they will greatly increase the likelihood that those offspring are going to be given sufficient time to develop before they are forced back out of the arctic (Meltofte et al. 2008).
_	Noting that codice_6, by design, does not work on the system drive while Windows is online, Bott concluded "it’s arguably a feature, not a bug, and the likelihood that you’ll ever crash a system this way is very, very small and completely avoidable."
_	When an interview is standardized, it increases the likelihood that an interviewee’s ratings are due to the quality of his/her responses instead of non-job-related and often distracting factors, such as appearance.
_	A marketer is often interested in understanding the 'base', or the likelihood that a consumer will convert without being influenced by marketing.
_	In considering the likelihood that the accused will attempt to evade trial if released, the court takes into account the following:
_	Also, the high ratio of damaging rains to beneficial rains likely symbolizes the ratio of the likelihood that crops are destroyed to them being nourished.
_	"If you asked me what is the likelihood that we're able to arrive at the end state that I was just describing earlier, I wouldn't say that it's more than 50/50."
_	There is also evidence that the promise to deploy peacekeepers can help an international organizations bring combatants to the negotiation table and increase the likelihood that they will agree to a cease-fire.
_	Some modern researchers question the likelihood that her father, a Reform Jew, would approve her union with Behan, an unemployed office-seeker, 14 years older than his daughter, a Gentile, and a divorced father.
_	The relative cost of false results determines the likelihood that test creators allow these events to occur.
_	Moreover, because anger makes negotiators more self-centered in their preferences, it increases the likelihood that they will reject profitable offers.
_	The consequence of a negative credit rating is typically a reduction in the likelihood that a lender will approve an application for credit under favorable terms, if at all.
_	It has not been strongly found that the race, class, gender, age etc. of an officer affects the likelihood that they will use force.
_	Furthermore, every protein that is added to the structural database increases the likelihood that the database will include homologous sequences of other unknown proteins.
_	Refuges (i. e., fields of nontransgenic plants) adjacent to transgenic fields increases the likelihood that homozygous resistant (s/s) individuals and any surviving heterozygotes will mate with susceptible (S/S) individuals from the refuge, instead of with other individuals carrying the resistance allele.
_	This early initiation increases the likelihood that, once the child becomes an adult, it will identify with the group.
_	The Alcohol Myopia Model proposes that intoxication increases the likelihood that an individual will decide to drive in an unsafe situation.
_	Internal anatomy is consistent with the likelihood that the plant has Krantz anatomy.
_	The primary danger with such practice is the likelihood that the waste will contact water, which could leach radioactive contamination into the environment.
_	The birth of a second son, also named Geoffrey, increased the likelihood that, in accordance with French custom, Henry would receive the English maternal inheritance and Geoffrey the Angevin paternal inheritance.
_	This statewide assessment is designed to test students’proficiency in mathematics and English and to reduce the likelihood that students will have to take remedial classes once they enter college.
_	These terms will enrich the catalog and increase the likelihood that searchers of all levels will find what they are looking for.
_	In some cases coma can give the brain an opportunity to heal and regenerate, but, in general, the longer a coma, the greater the likelihood that the person will remain in a vegetative state until death.
_	As the number of nodes in a cluster increases, so does the likelihood that one of them may fail at some point.
_	As Emperor Shizong saw the likelihood that his grandmother (the mother of both Emperor Taizong and his own father Yelü Bei) would oppose his succession, he took the main Liao army and continued back toward Liao proper, leaving an army at Heng (which Emperor Taizong had designated as the middle capital) as its garrison, along with many Han officials, including Zhang.
_	Certain treatments may improve the final tendon fiber quality, and subsequently increase the likelihood that the horse will return to full performance post-injury.
_	The F1 hybrid progeny will then be heterozygous for each gene variant, which in turn increases the likelihood that the genes will code for an optimal protein or enzyme.
_	Fred R. Shapiro, who had cast doubts on Niebuhr's claim, conceded in 2009 that, "The new evidence does not prove that Reinhold Niebuhr wrote [the prayer], but it does significantly improve the likelihood that he was the originator."
_	The second factor to be considered when determining the effectiveness of multiple learning environments is the likelihood that an individual will even use environmental cues when recalling.
_	Removal of fecal material helps to improve nest sanitation, which in turn helps to increase the likelihood that nestlings will remain healthy.
_	Knowledge mapping software can increase the number of hypotheses generated in group problem solving as well as the likelihood that a group will converge on a consensus.
_	In that conference Rothman described the Uruk Expansion trading network, and the likelihood that raw materials and technologies from the South Caucasus had reached the Mesopotamian homeland, which somehow was misinterpreted to say that Armenian culture was a source of Mesopototamian culture, which is not true.
_	Declining a contract will reduce the likelihood that a contract of the same type will appear later.
_	Structure-based virtual screening involves docking of candidate ligands into a protein target followed by applying a scoring function to estimate the likelihood that the ligand will bind to the protein with high affinity.
_	How well a proposed phylogeny fits the fossil record is indicative of the likelihood that the phylogeny is a true representation of evolutionary relationships.
_	Information on the presence of intermediate hosts, required for life cycle completion by many parasites, is also useful in determining the likelihood that a parasite may have infected a particular ancient society.
_	With the coming of World War II and the likelihood that Ceylon would face a military threat from Japan, Goonetilleke was placed at the head of a new Civil Defence Department as Civil Defence Commissioner in the War Cabinet of Ceylon, a move that proved to be justified when air raids on Colombo and other cities began in the spring of 1942.
_	Otherwise, the archaeological study confirmed the likelihood that police had massacred an unknown number of aboriginals at this second site.
_	As Jamestown was the nearest English settlement, and they had no record of being attacked by Tuscarora, the likelihood that the origin of those fair-skinned natives was the Lost Colony is high.
_	Growth factors - there is some low-quality evidence that growth factors may increase the likelihood that diabetic foot ulcers will heal completely.
_	In laboratory replications it was found that participants spend a disproportionate amount of time looking at a weapon in a scene, and this looking time is inversely related to the likelihood that individuals will subsequently identify the perpetrator of the crime.
_	A rating expresses the likelihood that the rated party will go into default within a given time horizon.
_	In a steam engine, the superheater re-heats the steam generated by the boiler, increasing its thermal energy and decreasing the likelihood that it will condense inside the engine.
_	This is because of the close relationship between mother and child and the likelihood that the language is spoken by the community at large.
_	As a practical matter, the longer a person is undocumented, the greater the likelihood that he or she will end up in a situation where no state recognizes him or her as a national.
_	The singer expresses a desire for a possible reunion in a new place in the future ("You could meet me if I sent you down the fare") but acknowledges the likelihood that the relationship is over ("But our good times are all gone/And I'm bound for moving on ...").
_	The probability of default is an estimate of the likelihood that the default event will occur.
_	A seizure may increase the likelihood that more seizures will occur; an old saying in epilepsy research is "seizures beget seizures".
_	Three weeks after his election, Pope Pius XI issued rules extending the time between the death of a pope and the start of the conclave in order to increase the likelihood that cardinals from distant locations could participate in the next conclave.
_	This element relates very accurately the likelihood that top quarks decay to down quarks.
_	Therefore, many dogs do not appear to pay much attention to the actual fighting ability of their opponent, presumably allowing differences in motivation (how much the dog values the resource) and perceived motivation (what the behavior of the other dog signifies about the likelihood that it will escalate) to play a much greater role.
_	The more serious the misconduct, the greater the likelihood that dismissal is the appropriate penalty.
_	This greatly reduces the probability of chargebacks and increases the likelihood that fraudulent chargebacks will be successfully overturned.
_	Regardless, at the 12 Hours of Sebring, Continental Tire debuted a more durable slick tyre which allowed for more aggressive setups and enhanced the likelihood that incidents such as the multiple punctures seen at Daytona would not reoccur in the future.
_	Since the Battle of Mycale was fought at least near-simultaneously with the Battle of Plataea, then this was a pool of manpower which could not have contributed to Plataea, and further reduces the likelihood that 110,000 Greeks assembled before Plataea.
_	At the start of October, with Patton's army stalled and supplies running out, the likelihood that the Americans would relieve the SAS had dwindled.
_	In "Zippo Manufacturing Co. v. Zippo Dot Com, Inc.," a Federal Court held that "the likelihood that personal jurisdiction can be constitutionally exercised is directly proportionate to the nature and quality of commercial activity that an entity conducts over the Internet.
_	Inhibition of TS depletes the cell of dTTP and causes accumulation of deoxyuridine monophosphate (dUMP), which increases the likelihood that uracil gets misincorporated into the DNA.
_	High self-regulatory ability and the lack of situational impairments on executive functioning increase the likelihood that individuals will successfully inhibit the influence of automatically activated schemas on their thinking and social behavior.
_	Skolnick is most known for demonstrating that the number of ligand binding pockets in proteins is quite small, thereby justifying the likelihood that large scale drug repurposing will work.
_	An expanded definition is: "Empowerment evaluation is an evaluation approach that aims to increase the likelihood that programs will achieve results by increasing the capacity of program stakeholders to plan, implement, and evaluate their own programs."
_	This is a tiny fraction of the lifespan of a galaxy under ordinary assumptions and calculations resulting from them, so the likelihood that we are in the midst of this transition is considered low in the paradox.
_	One represents the likelihood that a subgroup of a specific size will emerge; the other is the probability that it will persist.
_	Additionally, the river in the Magdellena river valley flows north, away from the mountains, decreasing the likelihood that otters in the northern tip of South America will mix with otters elsewhere in the continent.
_	Despite the small nature of the theft, and the likelihood that the kitchen staff had eaten the missing strawberries, Queeg pushes ahead with his investigation, insisting that a duplicate cabinet key must have been made and used, and demanding an onerous search of the entire vessel to find it.
_	All state-chartered banks henceforth would be required to participate in a form of deposit insurance, limits were set on the rate of interest which could be charged (to avoid usury), and the size of loans given to any individual or firm were restricted (to help rein in risk-taking and reduce the likelihood that a single large loan default could ruin the bank).
_	Webster's major discoveries relating to influenza include the likelihood that avians were most likely the culprit in other flu outbreaks.
_	The restorative approach, on the other hand, reintegrates wrongdoers back into their community and reduces the likelihood that they will reoffend.
_	Prompted recall is a slight variation of free recall that consists of presenting hints or prompts to increase the likelihood that the behavior will be produced.
_	An economic tablet from Nippur is dated “15th year (of) Kadašman-Enlil, month of Tašrītu, 18th day”, and is ascribed to him, rather than his descendent name-sake, because of the more archaic use of the masculine personal determinative before the royal name (the single vertical cuneiform stroke), and the likelihood that the later king reigned for no more than nine years.
_	Second, gloves are worn to reduce the likelihood that microorganisms present on the hands of personnel will be transmitted to patients during invasive or other patient-care procedures that involve touching a patient's mucous membranes and nonintact skin.
_	Third, they are worn to reduce the likelihood that the hands of personnel contaminated with micro-organisms from a patient or a fomite can transmit those micro-organisms to another patient.
_	With evidence contradicting the likelihood that the man was either of those whom the police considered in investigation (Caroline's modelling agent Adam Leigh or Rivkin associate Gary Redding) the Crown would choose to pose speculation without evidence on either during the trial and drew criticism from the trial judge and later the appellant judges.
_	Evolutionary psychologists have used the norm of reciprocity to explain altruism by emphasizing our expectations that “helping others will increase the likelihood that they will help us in the future.”
_	It can be assumed that the smaller the absolute size of a measured effect, the greater the likelihood that the effect is due to some extraneous, uncontrolled variable.
_	For the military agent, if the likelihood that shirking will be detected by the civilian principal is high or if the perceived costs of being punished are too high, the likelihood of shirking is low.
_	Peri also notes that the U.S. public school system has already invested in educating these individuals, and they are at the point at which they can start contributing to the U.S. economy and public coffers; deporting them or increasing the likelihood that they be deported is economically counterproductive.
_	Having a child with disabilities increases the likelihood that the mother (or less often the father) will either curtail hours of work or stop working altogether.
_	There is even, under the best scenario, over time, the likelihood that some of the jihadists who are not killed there will, in a sense, go home, wherever home is, and will therefore disperse to various other countries."
_	In this case, termination is not completed by degradation of mRNA but instead is mediated by limiting the elongation efficiency of RNA polymerase and thus increasing the likelihood that the polymerase will dissociate and end its current cycle of transcription.
_	Late seizures are thought to be the result of epileptogenesis, in which neural networks are restructured in a way that increases the likelihood that they will become excited, leading to seizures.
_	The conservation status of a species indicates the likelihood that it will become extinct.
_	Hamilton's main appeal is the emphasis they place on developing players from within, and the likelihood that the players coming through will be more likely to be given opportunities to prove themselves than elsewhere, as evidenced in both the 2016–17 and 2017–18 season when analysis by the "CIES Football Observatory" showed they were the leading club in the Scottish Premiership in terms of minutes on the field by homegrown players (Celtic also scored well, although the majority of their contributions came from three regulars who are in the Scottish national squad – Tierney, Forrest and McGregor – rather than untried youngsters being thrown in).
_	Insoles with ridges appear to reduce the likelihood that the COM motion will exceed the BOS limit in the lateral direction, thereby resulting in a stabilizing effect on gait.
_	New York Governor George Pataki had previously proposed completing the project, but D'Amato's support, as well as the promise of financial backing, increased the likelihood that construction would actually commence.
_	For example, watching a scary movie late at night might increase the accessibility of frightening schemas, increasing the likelihood that a person will perceive shadows and background noises as potential threats.
_	These results show that cohabitation with family, contributes to lower progesterone and prolactin concentrations in female Mongolian gerbils, which is shown to decrease the likelihood that infanticide will occur.
_	While ground penetrating radar may not be infallible, the likelihood that over 700 people were buried there is slim.
_	However, there are some critical views regarding the likelihood that these policies will significantly increase female labor participation.
_	Combining these sources of information, a dollar value can be placed on each household within a trade area detailing the likelihood that household will be worth to a company.
_	The criminal charges increased the likelihood that Winterkorn would face similar actions in his native Germany, and impact an existing shareholders lawsuit against Volkswagen.
_	Another downside is that if a standard is agreed upon before products are available in the market, then consumers are deprived of the penetration pricing that often results when rivals are competing to rapidly increase market share in an attempt to increase the likelihood that their product will become the standard.
_	However, the fact that liquid water is believed to exist below Europa's icy surface, along with the likelihood that colonists would spend much of their time under the ice sheet in order to shield themselves from radiation, may somewhat mitigate the problems associated with low surface temperatures.
_	Political orientation, e.g. where a person falls on the conservative to liberal political continuum, also shapes the likelihood that people will interrupt others or will be interrupted themselves.
_	In "Arabidopsis" and other plant species, the IMEter has been developed to calculate the likelihood that an intron sequence will enhance gene expression.
_	Because it is self-incompatible, flowers of one cactus require pollen from another individual of the species for fertilization; when plants are rare and spread apart, the likelihood that a pollinator will stop at the plant and deliver the correct pollen is lower.
_	A particularly important measure of moneyness is the likelihood that the derivative will expire in the money, in the risk-neutral measure.
_	Some argue that installation of fishways at Hells Gate caused more than just an increase in Fraser salmon, claiming that it was also a tactic to reduce the likelihood that the construction of future hydroelectric dams in the Fraser canyon would ever gain popular support.
_	Variability in conotoxin components reduces the likelihood that prey organisms will develop resistance; thus cone snails are under constant selective pressure to maintain polymorphism in these genes because failing to evolve and adapt will lead to extinction ("Red Queen hypothesis").
_	This is a result of the likelihood that random distribution will result in multiple players with assigned balls numbered lower than 8 having an opportunity to shoot first, and that with such large a number of players at least one will come to the table with the opportunity to shoot at his assigned ball.
_	The more confident we are, the less we will worry about our future behavior which actually increases the likelihood that we will engage in immoral behaviors.
_	Head Start may increase the likelihood that African-American males graduate from high school.
_	For example, a character's strength rating could be used to determine the likelihood that the character can lift a certain weight.
_	Further inbreeding within the captive population may also increase the likelihood that deleterious alleles will be expressed due to increasing homozygosity within the population.
_	Essentially, these tools collect a variety of input variables from an individual and use them to project the likelihood that the individual will meet specified retirement goals.
_	Because Filipinos lived in the same neighborhoods as Mexican-Americans, the likelihood that Filipinos adopted this specific style of dress from Mexican-Americans was high.
_	Any factor that affects the likelihood that an organism is preserved as a fossil is a potential source of bias.
_	However, the report stated "The absence of a distress radio call, or an attempt to descend the aircraft, and the likelihood that the pilot did not don his oxygen mask, suggested that the pilot was unaware that the aircraft was unpressurised or depressurising."
_	A critical media, active civil society and the presence of protests can contribute to the likelihood that reform will occur.
_	In his 1986 and 1987 SETI papers, Tough had discussed the likelihood that such a civilization can (one way or another) reach or study our solar system.
_	A credit score in the United States is a number representing the creditworthiness of a person, the likelihood that person will pay his or her debts.
_	If a child is separated from his/her caretakers during the process of resettlement, the likelihood that he/she will develop a mental illness increases.
_	Infants also use statistical tracking to calculate the likelihood that particular phonemes will follow each other.<ref name = "Romberg/saffron">
_	Since relatives share part of the helper's genetic make-up, enhancing each individual's chance of survival may actually increase the likelihood that the helper's genetic traits will be passed on to future generations.
_	substantially reducing the likelihood that such described activities will result in a civil or criminal violation of law under the Computer Fraud and Abuse Act (18 U.S.C. § 1030)."
_	In a June 1994 interview with "The Daily Oklahoman", Harlan Reams, then KOKH's president and general manager, stated that the station would not offer a regular newscast, even with the likelihood that its ratings and revenue would increase once Fox took over the National Football Conference television contract that fall.
_	This may be due to the likelihood that these events are often caused ongoing problems or the result in them, where a quick fix is often not possible.
_	When a person has not been unconscious, failure of carbohydrate to reverse the symptoms in 10–15 minutes increases the likelihood that hypoglycemia was not the cause of the symptoms.
_	This game was for the championship of the AAWU (then informally known as the Pac-8 and now the Pac-12), a berth in the Rose Bowl game, and for the likelihood that the winner of the game would be the AP Poll National Champion, as the final poll was published at the end of the regular season.
_	These engineered fasteners join layers of metal together without punching completely through the bottom layer, thus reducing the likelihood that rivets will become the source of leaks in the future.
_	IDs are different across all the devices a user may interact with, Drawbridge then computes a confidence-score based on the likelihood that IDs from different sources belong to the same person or identity.
_	When these atoms lose an electron, the likelihood that they will absorb energy increases.
_	However, "the presence of the pipeline, which offers an inexpensive way to move the oil to market, could increase the likelihood that companies would extract from the oil sands even when prices are low".
_	They additionally opined that the standard was in line with the public purpose of patent law, since construing a patent claim according to its broadest reasonable construction helps to protect the public by increasing the likelihood that a patent examiner will deny a patent claim on the basis that it is too broad, thereby encouraging applicants to draft their claims narrowly and preventing patents "from tying up too much knowledge, while helping members of the public draw useful information from the disclosed invention and better understand the lawful limits of the claim."
_	Endovascular interventions, including surgical revascularization, can increase blood flow in the area of the stroke, thereby decreasing the likelihood that insufficient blood flow to the watershed regions of the brain will result in subsequent strokes.
_	The first classification refers to the likelihood that the drawing may be perceived as two (or more) different objects.
_	Gaspare Mutolo warned the Commission in February 1993 of the likelihood that further attacks were being planned by the Corleonesi on the mainland.
_	Slow diffusion rates also prevent contamination by leaking or loss of isotopes from the crystal, increasing the likelihood that chronologic and compositional measurements are accurate.
_	From studying Mexican migration patterns, Douglas Massey finds that the likelihood that a Mexican national will emigrate illegally to the US increases dramatically if they have one or more family members already residing in the United States, legally or illegally.
_	Amplification score relates to the likelihood that one's messages will generate actions, such as retweets, mentions, likes and comments.
_	This implies that the likelihood that a randomly chosen number less than formula_1 is prime is (approximately) inversely proportional to the number of digits in formula_1.
_	If the inspection method and instruments are considered and selected at the design stage, the likelihood that a tolerance feature cannot be inspected or requires a specialised instrument is substantially reduced.
_	also found that the larger the difference between recognition latencies (for two objects), the greater the likelihood that the actual inference adheres to that predicted by the fluency heuristic.
_	Croatian president Franjo Tuđman was also a target of critics and allegations of nepotism and the likelihood that he personally profited.
_	The second factor, probability, refers to the likelihood that the close relationship with the individual can actually be formed.
_	It can also be conceptualized as the likelihood that self-expansion will occur.
_	The theory for adoption of an innovation, called "diffusion of innovations", considers the likelihood that an innovation is adopted and the taxonomy of persons likely to adopt it or spur its adoption.
_	Thus Maslow acknowledged the likelihood that the different levels of motivation could occur at any time in the human mind, but he focused on identifying the basic types of motivation and the order in which they would tend to be met.
_	Higher password bit strength exponentially increases the number of candidate passwords that must be checked, on average, to recover the password and reduces the likelihood that the password will be found in any cracking dictionary.
_	Outdoor spray fireproofing methods that must be qualified to the hydrocarbon curve may be required to pass a host of environmental tests before any burn takes place, to minimize the likelihood that ordinary operational environments cannot render a vital system component useless before it ever encounters a fire.
_	Teachers and curriculum developers should bear in mind that any attention to form, i.e., grammar or vocabulary, increases the likelihood that learners may be distracted from the task itself and become preoccupied with detecting and correcting errors and/or looking up language in dictionaries and grammar references.
_	Alexithymia is considered to be a personality trait that places affected individuals at risk for other medical and psychiatric disorders while reducing the likelihood that these individuals will respond to conventional treatments for the other conditions.
_	Consequently, this increases the likelihood that one can age in place.
_	African-Americans, Health Disparities, and HIV/AIDS” credits widespread, voluntary HIV testing with alerting those who are HIV-positive to their status, directing them to early treatment, and reducing the likelihood that they will transmit the virus to others.
_	The objective of the model is to assess the likelihood that a similar unit in a different sample will exhibit the specific performance.
_	Subsequent statements by Lewis and internal court documents support the likelihood that overvotes would have been included in the recount.
_	The test then evaluates the likelihood that an examinee's true score on that metric is equal to one of those two points.
_	Every word was believed to contain its own threshold that dictated the likelihood that it would be perceived after attenuation.
_	The existence of altruism in nature is at first sight puzzling, because altruistic behaviour reduces the likelihood that an individual will reproduce.
_	State senator Kel Seliger, the chair of the Senate's Select Committee on Redistricting, also downplayed the likelihood that redistricting legislation would be passed but emphasized the importance of creating a "credible instrument for the court to consider."
_	Wall's critique centred on the link between the structure of leadership and ambition of the party; and the likelihood that a Leader coupled with ambition would be part of a project to move the party to the "right":
_	With the likelihood that Wilmot would have no trouble gaining the floor in the House debate, he was chosen to present the amendment to the appropriations bill that would carry his name.
_	His instructions to Mason and Slidell were to emphasize the stronger position of the Confederacy now that it had expanded from seven to eleven states, with the likelihood that Maryland, Missouri, and Kentucky would also eventually join the new nation.
_	Empirical research shows that sexual orientation does not affect the likelihood that people will abuse children.
_	where progressively more convincing nonsense is generated first by choosing letters and spaces randomly, then according to the frequency with which each character appears in some sample of text, then respecting the likelihood that the chosen letter appears after the preceding one or two in the sample text, and then applying similar techniques to whole words.
_	Observing objects that are neither black nor ravens may formally increase the likelihood that all ravens are black even though, intuitively, these observations are unrelated.
_	The Barbary Coast was also very egalitarian in its religious diversity, Christian services being held in various places, decreasing the likelihood that a Christian would have no place in Islamic society.
_	Only speech that poses an imminent danger of unlawful action, where the speaker has the intention to incite such action and there is the likelihood that this will be the consequence of his or her speech, may be restricted and punished by that law.
_	Engineering surveys resulted in the likelihood that the homes were unsalvageable, leaving angry residents looking for the landowners and developers to take responsibility.
_	The same 2016 study found a notable relationship between the racial composition of a member’s district, region, and electoral competition, and the likelihood that a state lawmaker supported a voter ID bill.
_	The co-training models utilize both classifiers to determine the likelihood that a page will contain data relevant to the search criteria."
_	A 2015 Cochrane review recommended "Lactobacillus rhamnosus" or "S. boulardii" at 5 to 40 billion colony-forming units/day for the prevention of AAD in children, given the modest number needed to treat and the likelihood that adverse events are very rare.
_	The more distinct the timbre of groups of pitches within one stream, the greater the likelihood that listeners will separate them into different streams.
_	This ability would enable a creature to recognize the likelihood that their perceptions are deceiving them (e.g. that water in the distance may be a mirage) and behave accordingly, and it could also facilitate the manipulation of others by recognizing how things appear to them for both cooperative and devious ends.
_	In support of Jeyaretnam, Opposition MP Chiam See Tong claimed that the PAP government had introduced GRCs to reduce the likelihood that by-elections would be necessary.
_	Thus the design does not adequately reduce the likelihood that the victim's heart enters into a deadly ventricular fibrillation.
_	By definition, in a completed burglary, the burglar has entered the building, where the closer proximity of prowler and victim increases the likelihood that injury will result from any confrontation between the two.
_	Individual’s perceptions of the desirability of mood change and the likelihood that a strategy may work are what bring about success.
_	There were no significant difference in the likelihood that Hispanics would be pulled over, but Hispanics were much more likely to be searched following a traffic stop than whites.
_	Due to the high temperatures on the illuminated side of the planet, and the likelihood that all surface volatiles have been depleted, silicate rock vaporization may have produced a tenuous atmosphere (with a pressure approaching 1 Pa or 10 mbar at 2500 K) consisting predominantly of sodium, O, O and silicon monoxide, as well as smaller amounts of potassium and other metals.
_	Consequently, some atheist authors such as Richard Dawkins prefer distinguishing theist, agnostic and atheist positions along a spectrum of theistic probability—the likelihood that each assigns to the statement "God exists".
_	Modern archaeological research has not yielded much evidence of human sacrifice among the Celts, and the ancient Greco-Roman sources are now regarded somewhat skeptically, especially considering the likelihood that Greeks and Romans "were eager to transmit any bizarre and negative information" about the Celts at a time when the latter were feared and disdained.
_	Data is collected using telephone interviews, which permits clarifying questions, and uses a bounded time frame of six months, limiting the likelihood that results are overestimated due to "telescoping" (the reporting of events occurring outside of a reference period as though they occurred within the specified period).
_	There is one extant letter written by Nicolas to his parents during this time; in the letter, he explains that he does not want to return to France due to the French Revolution and the likelihood that he would be conscripted into the army.
_	Observing others engage in self injury influences the likelihood that an individual will also engage in NSSI.
_	studied archival data from Jerusalem in 2004 and found that the presence of an additional person in the car during a driving license test decreased the likelihood that the testee would pass the driving test.
_	Parents thus have some measure of control over the likelihood that their children will succeed in school.
_	Hyperexcitability, a characteristic feature of epileptogenesis in which the likelihood that neural networks will be activated is increased, may be due to loss of inhibitory neurons, such as GABAergic interneurons, that would normally balance out the excitability of other neurons.
_	The agreement may have affected the likelihood that a Senate minority would defeat subsequent nominations to the U.S. Supreme Court (e.g., the nominations of John Roberts and Samuel Alito).
_	The portion of heavier elements may be an indicator of the likelihood that the star has a planetary system.
_	In September, a 10% share in Rakti was sold to the Hong Kong Breeders Club, increasing the likelihood that he would compete in December's Hong Kong Mile.
_	The difficulty is the likelihood that all of the layout can be seen at once, and the problem of finding any sort of visual break between the two sides.
_	Section 43 establishes the right to be reasonably protected from the accused throughout the adult criminal and juvenile delinquency process and the right to have decisions by the court about the pretrial release of the accused based upon the principles of reasonable protection of the victim and the public, and the likelihood that the accused will appear for trial.
_	In her introduction to the Malone Society edition, Helen Moore downplays the likelihood that Sparrow is meant to represent Shakespeare.
_	Americans use preventive services at about half the recommended rate and cost-sharing, such as deductibles, co-insurance, or copayments, also reduce the likelihood that preventive services will be used.
_	These adjustments are designed to either decrease the likelihood that the transit vehicle will arrive during a red interval or decrease the length of the red interval for those vehicles that are stopped.
_	This assumption ignored the likelihood that Portuguese and Spanish guerillas would prevent Soult's dispatches from reaching his colleagues.
_	A lifelong smoker, she began smoking when she was 11 years, she was diagnosed with COPD and faced with the likelihood that she would develop pulmonary emphysema if she didn't give up smoking.
_	In the case of evolution, it combines the likelihood of the data observed with the likelihood that the events happened in the order they did, while recognizing the potential for error and uncertainty.
_	Along with the February 1995 hearings on the future of Quebec and 12 June 1995 Tripartite agreement between Parizeau, Bouchard and Dumont, the sovereignty bill was designed to both get people interested in discussing Quebec sovereignty and reassure Quebecers about the likelihood that a sovereign Quebec would retain links with Canada.
_	The Burial Council's core contention is the city's decision to conduct an archaeological survey of the rail line's route in phases, meaning construction on a majority of the line will be complete by the time the survey in the Kakaako area is performed, which in turn increases the likelihood that any remains discovered will be moved instead of being allowed to remain "in situ".
_	Basing their conclusions on the likelihood that his illness was related to the Peru trip, doctors narrowed down the possible causes for Farrar's gastrointestinal issues to a handful, though none fitted his symptoms perfectly: typhoid fever, tropical sprue, or gluten-sensitive enteropathy.
_	To succeed on a claim for preliminary injunction, Garcia had to show four factors: a likelihood that she would succeed on the merits of the copyright claim, the likelihood that irreparable harm will result if the court does not grant the injunction, and the balance of the equity to the parties and the public interest in granting or denying relief.
_	Due to Nazi Germany's growing political and social repression and the likelihood that the regime might target the family (Nabokov's mother was Jewish), the family fled to Paris in 1937, and emigrated to New York City in 1940.
_	Styles also felt that the potential bomb was unlikely to have been detonated with a remote detonator on account of the buildings between the scenes of the shootings and the likelihood that it would be drowned out by other radio signals in the area.
_	Spawning induction and successful fertilization has only been achieved in some species of sea cucumbers and the likelihood that a method will work or not is highly dependent on the species.
_	This usually requires the missile to fly for longer, increasing the likelihood that the missile will run out of fuel or otherwise not reach the target.
_	Rowley has said that the likelihood that these craters could be aligned like this due to chance is nearly zero.
_	Additionally, Dufton considered their dismissal from the police force and the likelihood that the officers would lose their pensions.
_	Nietzsche's sister confirmed that he had indeed read the original account when he was 11 years old; Nietzsche's youthful intellectual capabilities, his later cognitive degeneration, and his accompanying psychological deterioration (specifically, his increasing grandiosity as manifested in his later behavior and writings) together strengthen the likelihood that he happened to commit the passage to memory upon initially reading it and later, after having lost his memory of encountering it, assumed that his own mind had created it.
_	This substantially decreases the likelihood that a bomb can harm the structure.
_	Before the abolition of slavery, these black-populated communities offered protection and aid to fugitive slaves, and "the likelihood that there was antebellum Underground Railroad activity is high".
_	(While his homosexuality was proven over time, investigation into his past has shown the likelihood that he was at one time christened as a Calvinist.
_	We could say that the likelihood that it was done accidentally was incredibly remote.
_	Initially intending to erect a complete skeleton, Boylan was daunted by the task, as well as the likelihood that few of the bones came from the same animal, or even the same species.
_	This can help decrease wait times as well as increase the likelihood that such patients will seek out nearby healthcare facilities rather than traveling farther distances as a last resort.
_	This points to the likelihood that Christian worship has been offered here for well over 1000 years.
_	This was a strategic move meant to increase the likelihood that the bill would be passed in both the House and the Senate.
_	In turn, this male acceptance reduces the likelihood that the female will be attacked by the males, and increases the likelihood that the males will protect them from hostile resident females.
_	Evidence suggest that N-Cadherins stabilize the connection between the presynaptic terminal and postsynaptic spine and that this stabilization increases the likelihood that released glutamate will bind receptors on the postsynaptic neuron.
_	All of these approaches to the problem can only reduce the likelihood that they will struggle to get depth, and does not guarantee a definitive solution in the general case.
_	By using fixed effects regression analysis and taking into account the likelihood that a player would not retire at the end of his contract, this statistically significant boost occurs.
_	Since each HLA has a different affinity for peptides of certain structures, greater variety of HLAs means greater variety of antigens to be 'presented' on the cell surface, enhancing the likelihood that a subset of the population will be resistant to a given foreign invader.
_	This decreases the likelihood that a single pathogen has the capability to wipe out the entire human population.
_	They believe that agencies will be able to "'shop' for judges that have demonstrated a strong bias toward law enforcement with regard to search warrants, using only those judges least likely to say no—even if the warrant doesn't satisfy the strict requirements of the Fourth Amendment to the Constitution", and that it reduces the likelihood that smaller ISPs or phone companies will try to protect the privacy of their clients by challenging the warrant in court—their reasoning is that "a small San Francisco ISP served with such a warrant is unlikely to have the resources to appear before the New York court that issued it."
_	Serious doubt is emerging that reduces the likelihood that "Archaeamphora longicervia" belongs in the Sarraceniaceae lineage, or was even a pitcher plant at all.
_	ApEn reflects the likelihood that "similar" patterns of observations will not be followed by additional "similar" observations.
_	It was reported that the passage of ACES in Congress would increase the likelihood that a successor to the Kyoto Protocol would be adopted at the United Nations Climate Change Conference 2009 in Copenhagen.
_	Oral intake on the mother's part increases the amount of "L. reuteri" present in her milk, and the likelihood that it will be transferred to the child.
_	The harsh criticism that the sitcom received, and the likelihood that it would be axed after one season, led to its being used as a cipher on Richard Bacon's BBC 6Music show during 2009-10.
_	Realizing the likelihood that Gant has been hired to kill her father, she goes to Gant's room with a gun.
_	In certain scenarios it may be impossible for the passages to be spoken by the individual due to the likelihood that the listener recognizes
_	Thus the research mentioned suggests that feeling connected to nature, decreases the likelihood that people will harm it because harming nature would be similar to harming oneself
_	Princesses, for example, have a "Charm" attribute that governs their success in diplomacy and the likelihood that a proposal in marriage will be accepted.
_	Expert Determination takes a risk-based approach to de-identification that applies current standards and best practices from the research to determine the likelihood that a person could be identified from their protected health information.
_	In a nation where the power of crystals and the likelihood that angels hover nearby prompt more contemplation than ridicule, it may not be surprising that one million people a year call Ms. Warwick’s friends."
_	Thus, the blood–testis barrier may reduce the likelihood that sperm proteins will induce an immune response, reducing fertility and so progeny.
_	Light rail could contribute to lower rates of obesity and other nutrition-related chronic diseases, such as hypertension and diabetes, by increasing the likelihood that residents in food deserts can easily travel to neighborhoods with cheaper and healthier food options.
_	Moreover, he noted, "Encouraging drug use might well increase the likelihood that a listener will try an illegal drug, but that hardly justifies censorship".
_	It was close to the bank of the River Glomma, and because of the likelihood that it would be undercut by erosion, a decision had been taken in 1794 to rebuild it further from the river, but this had not yet been done.
_	In deciding whether to grant preliminary relief the court must consider (a) the likelihood that the FTC will ultimately succeed on the merits; and (b) balance the equities.
_	Measurement of the acoustics used in sonoporation is listed in terms of mechanical index, which quantifies the likelihood that exposure to diagnostic ultrasound will produce an adverse biological effect by a non-thermal action based on pressure.
_	She asserts that increased access to education, health care, jobs and higher earnings lead to more abortions of unborn female children, drawing a direct correlation between the number of educational degrees a woman has and the likelihood that she will eliminate unborn daughters.
_	As part of this strategy, the NCAA strives “to ensure the academic commitment of student-athletes and to increase the likelihood that they will earn degrees.”17
_	Characteristics desired in the weapon included: portability and maneuverability; similarity in appearance to other rifles in the squad, reducing the likelihood that the gunner will receive special attention from the enemy; facilitation of the gunner's participation in counter-insurgency operations and capability of maintaining a high volume of fire.
_	Iskuhi sees the end coming and the likelihood that their love entails dying together, not a life.
_	TTT stages in the Tour usually take place in opening days because of the likelihood that all of the team's riders would still be participating.
_	Finally, Eugene decides to help Gabriel and Doctor Carson escape despite the likelihood that it will result in Gabriel's death due to his condition.
_	When researchers investigated the likelihood that an individual would be a regular program exerciser, defined as a participant in the program who checked in at a participating facility at least 8 times per month, for at least 50% of the time period for which the financial incentive was offered.
_	Since relatives share part of their genetic make-up, enhancing each other’s chances of survival may actually increase the likelihood that the helper’s genetic traits will be passed on to future generations.
_	Regular visits to a dentist also increases the likelihood that problems are detected early and averted before toothache occurs.
_	It must not connect a vertical drain to a horizontal drain, because of the likelihood that solids will accumulate at the bottom of the junction and cause a blockage.
_	There is an association between a parent's welfare dependency and that of her children; a mother's welfare participation increases the likelihood that her daughter, when grown, will also be dependent on welfare.
_	Etiolation increases the likelihood that a plant will reach a light source, often from under the soil, leaf litter, or shade from competing plants.
_	Certainly, Domnall's cooperation would have been a valuable asset to Toirdelbach, considering the prominence of his father amongst the Dubliners, and the likelihood that Domnall himself may have lived most of his life there.
_	The well-known Koch's postulates, 19th-century constructs developed by Robert Koch to establish the likelihood that "Bacillus anthracis" will cause anthrax disease, are not applicable to viral diseases.
_	More elaborate ornamentation increases the likelihood that a male will mate and has been shown to affect survival of their offspring.
_	STARGATE was initially funded by in seed money provided by the Greater Brownsville Incentives Corporation in October 2012, which was intended to improve the likelihood that Brownsville would be successful in attracting SpaceX to build a launch site in the area.
_	Kasich cited the cost to taxpayers of defending the legislation in court, and the likelihood that the "Heartbeat Bill" would be struck down in federal court as reasons for vetoing the more restrictive bill.
_	Other factors that increase the likelihood that the MPTP will be induced include the presence of certain fatty acids, and inorganic phosphate.
_	Each hypothesis is given a vote proportional to the likelihood that the training dataset would be sampled from a system if that hypothesis were true.
_	First, a large spermatophore decreases the likelihood that the recipient female will remate, and if she does, a large spermatophore ensures a better chance of paternity for the first male moth.
_	Its mission is to increase the likelihood that young people from Maine will aspire to, pursue and achieve a college education.
_	He said that Defence Minister Abd al-Qadr Muhammed Jassim al-Obaidi had informed the Iraqi Parliament during emergency parliamentary hearings in 2009 that "the detection of car bombs and explosive material using these devices is very limited, and this increases the likelihood that these devices have low efficiency."
_	McDaniel sent her daughter, Eva Pearl, to boarding school to improve the likelihood that she would have better opportunities.
_	The basic outline of equine coat color genetics has largely been resolved, and DNA tests to determine the likelihood that a horse will have offspring of a given color have been developed for some colors.
_	Given the gravity of such an action—only one Privy Counsellor, Edgar Speyer, was struck off the list during the 20th century—and the likelihood that accusations of vindictiveness would result, the British government was loath to do this, and hoped that Beadle would remove the need for it by resigning.
_	He moved to Lancashire in 1972 largely as insurance for the likelihood that regular opening bowlers Peter Lever and Ken Shuttleworth would be called up for Test cricket by England, but with those bowlers doing extremely badly, Lee became their first choice opening bowler.
_	The advent of storm chasing, in particular, boosts the likelihood that satellite tornadoes are noticed visually and/or on mobile radar.
_	The first was the likelihood that the battlecruisers would be fully committed in countering the growing and very capable German battlecruiser force.
_	The Conservative Party declared its support for the reforms, making passage certain but increasing the likelihood that Labour MPs would vote against them.
_	There is also some worry that if video testimony becomes more relied upon in court cases, not having video evidence from body cameras would decrease the likelihood that the court system believes credible testimony from police officers and witnesses
_	In some cases he demonstrates the likelihood that the author simply forgot a minor detail.
_	A positive test increases the likelihood that the abdominal wall and not the abdominal cavity is the source of the pain (for example, due to rectus sheath hematoma instead of appendicitis).
_	Physicist Ali Alousi, for instance, criticized it as unmeasurable and questioned the likelihood that thoughts can affect anything outside the head.
_	Adama eventually convinced Roslin that, despite the likelihood that a Baltar presidency would be "disastrous," they should announce that there had been a "tabulation error" and allow Baltar to take office rather than betraying their principles.
_	Criminals fear the likelihood that a resident, upon viewing the intrusion, would then question their actions.
_	As a result, Shredder opted to aid the Kraang in their invasion of New York and the Earth, dismissing the likelihood that the Kraang will turn on him.
_	In addition to exposure to incidents of bullying, being male also seems to increase the likelihood that one will engage in bullying behavior.
_	In risk-sharing schemes, the insurance premium is unrelated to the likelihood that the beneficiary will fall ill and benefits are provided on the basis of need.
_	The game also features a system referred to as the pressure meter, a gauge that is displayed above every car which fills up as the player gets closer to a rival car; the higher the meter, the greater the likelihood that the AI will make a critical mistake.
_	Personalizing advertisements is another strategy that can work well for brands, as it can increase the likelihood that the brand will be anthropomorphized by the consumer.
_	The creation of burhs at Oxford and Buckingham at this time fits in with the likelihood that Alfred was able to regain control of this area which he had exercised before being deprived of it as a result of the Viking partition of 877, and their siting demonstrates that he was able to initiate a strategic offensive against the Vikings in Eastern Mercia and London.
_	In an Australia-wide survey published in November 2015, which was based on 1,573 interviews, which asked, "What is the likelihood that Islamic State will carry out a large scale terrorist attack in Australia?" 24% of the respondents said "it is inevitable", 23% said "very likely" and 29% said "likely".
_	Biological, clinical, and demographic factors contribute to the likelihood that an injury will be fatal.
_	The Chinese stood firm, and refused to withdraw substantial garrisons of Chinese regular troops from Sơn Tây, Bắc Ninh and Lạng Sơn, despite the likelihood that they would be shortly engaged in battle against the French.
_	These suggestions can improve clickthrough rates of the customer's listing and increase the likelihood that a user will enter into a transaction with the customer.
_	In statistics, the odds for or odds of some event reflect the likelihood that the event will take place, while odds against reflect the likelihood that it will not.
_	However, the heuristic that leads to majority rule when there are only two options is that the larger the number of people who think one option is better than the other, the greater the likelihood that it is better, all else being equal (see Condorcet's Jury Theorem).
_	Males who arrive earlier increase the likelihood that they will obtain good nesting sites, improving their odds for attracting more females.
_	Bit-flipping attacks can be prevented by including message authentication code to increase the likelihood that tampering will be detected.
_	Aside from the likelihood that the game contained themes as controversial as "Sex 'n' Drugs 'n' Rock 'n' Roll", in an interview with "Total Video Game"'s Derek dela Fuente, Jon did mention that the title had "hit some technical barriers" during its development.
_	Firstly, Meadow was accused of espousing the so-called prosecutor's fallacy in which the probability of "cause given effect" (i.e. the true likelihood of a suspect's innocence) is confused with that of "effect given cause" (the likelihood that innocence will result in the observed double-cot-death).
_	Since then several steps have been taken to further improve the peer review process in order to improve the quality assessment on articles submitted to the journal and reduce the likelihood that this could happen again.
_	In so doing, the Corps also dropped the option of breaching the levee from the list of solutions being considered, and study options for repairing the existing levee, thereby significantly reducing the likelihood that the village will have to be destroyed or relocated.
_	While making allowance for the likelihood that Book of Mormon peoples migrated to Mexico and Central America, Joseph Smith nevertheless placed the arrival of the Jaredites in "the lake country of America", i.e., the region of the Great Lakes).
_	Vomiting after a coughing spell or an inspiratory whooping sound on coughing, almost doubles the likelihood that the illness is pertussis.
_	Important considerations to be discussed include amount of time since counseling service termination, duration of counseling, nature and circumstances of client's counseling, the likelihood that the client will want to resume counseling at some time in the future; circumstances of service termination and possible negative effects or outcomes."
_	A golfer's performances can be quite variable from one round to the next, so playing an extra round increases the likelihood that the senior majors will be won by leading players.
_	It has been proposed that this difference is related to the likelihood that the external environment reduces or enhances microbial growth.
_	In the groups that did not report the smoke, the interpretations of its cause, and the likelihood that it was genuinely threatening was also less serious, with no-one suggesting fire as a possible cause, but some preferring less serious explanations, such as the air-conditioner was leaking.
_	There is even, under the best scenario, over time, the likelihood that some of the jihadists who are not killed there will, in a sense, go home, wherever home is, and will therefore disperse to various other countries."
_	His charge was reduced to manslaughter and assault, based on the likelihood that it was her stress reaction to his verbal and physical abuse that led to the intracranial bleeding, rather than blunt-force trauma from the blow that left no lasting mark.
_	The report first discussed the likelihood that cyber-attacks would succeed against SERVE; as well as to what extent an event such as a hacker breakthrough could compromise an election.
_	For instance, in comparative sequence analysis a probability measure may be defined for the likelihood that a variant may be permissible for an amino acid in a sequence.
_	In a mixed-strategy Nash equilibrium, an increase in N players will decrease the likelihood that at least one person volunteers, which is a result of the bystander effect.
_	With the likelihood that the engine and equipment failures coupled with the inability to reach design speeds and subsequent instability experienced were insurmountable problems, the USAF cancelled the program in September 1956.
_	In both cases, the goal of reinforcement is always to strengthen the behavior and increase the likelihood that it will occur again in the future.
_	If two genes are located close together on a chromosome, the likelihood that a recombination event will separate these two genes is less than if they were farther apart.
_	Likewise, a study by Stice et al. in the "Journal of Abnormal Psychology" concluded that there is a direct relationship between the amount of media exposure that a young woman has and the likelihood that she will develop eating disorder symptoms.
_	Hearing this, Tutuola resigns himself to the likelihood that his transfer will not be effected anytime soon.
_	Rothenberg said Clarke would eventually come to terms with the likelihood that, if she had been in a similar position as Lexa, she would have done the same thing:
_	This is because of its small range-size (one single crater lake) and the likelihood that fish could be introduced to the lake.
_	These effects can help to reduce the achievement gap between wealthy and disadvantaged students by increasing the likelihood that all students take required college-preparatory courses, complete entrance exams such as the ACT or SAT, apply for college and for needed financial aid, and are otherwise on a 'college track'.
_	Previous research suggested that selective activation of left prefrontal cortex might increase the likelihood that an attitude would predict a relevant behavior.
_	But the sheep-goat effect suggests that the differences run deeper than mere interpretation: one's attitudes toward psi affects the likelihood that such phenomena will occur in the first place.
_	The Drake equation amounts to a summary of the factors affecting the likelihood that we might detect radio-communication from intelligent extraterrestrial life.
_	Given that there exists the assumption that there is simply one option in the procedures and that within training procedures optional actions are disregarded, the likelihood that a reactor trip failure will be incorrectly diagnosed is minimal.
_	Shortly after the war began, the threat of the Australian battlecruiser , plus the likelihood that Japan would join the Allies, prompted the German squadron to head into the Pacific Ocean, as the first stage of a retreat to Germany.
_	This hyperpolarization decreases the likelihood that the membrane will send an action potential to neighboring neurons; the difference of charge across the membrane has increased, while it would need to decrease in order to reach the threshold charge necessary to propagate an action potential.
_	With red wines, a high level of flavor compounds, such as phenolics (most notably tannins), will increase the likelihood that a wine will be able to age.
_	With "Cum proxime", Pius XI extended the time between the death of a pope and the start of the conclave to increase the likelihood that cardinals from distant locations could reach Rome in time to participate.
_	The Personality Assessment Screener ) is a 22-item instrument that provides an index of the likelihood that an important clinical elevation would occur on the PAI.
_	Additionally, high doses of total body irradiation can eradicate residual cancer cells in the transplant recipient, increasing the likelihood that the transplant will be successful.
_	Congress allocated $15 million for studies for the project in November 2011, with the likelihood that the two projects, Gateway and the subway extension, will be in competition for funding.
_	This may be due to the likelihood that people were thinking of their next response, rather than processing the source of the information.
_	The ability to measure customer loyalty is a more effective methodology to determine the likelihood that the customer will buy again, talk up the company and resist market pressure to defect to a competitor.
_	It may also claim that the victim is selling illegal or offensive items such as illegal drugs, automatic weapons or child pornography to increase the likelihood that the recipient will take action against the victim.
_	These ruffles tend to dissipate wave energy and lessen the likelihood that it will be torn from the rock.
_	While these spring-loaded extractors are found on even inexpensive models, the spring-loaded extractor is not as strong as a solid extractor, and increases the likelihood that failures to extract will occur.
_	The Capital Requirements Regulation (EU) No. 575/2013 is an EU law that aims to decrease the likelihood that banks go insolvent.
_	"Uncut" wrote that "The pair's [Mercer and Kurstin] pop instincts ultimately prevail over more esoteric ambitions," and Slant Magazine felt "Port of Morrow" less important than the band's other works, but did not rule out the likelihood that "many of its subtle strengths will grow more powerful with time."
_	In genetics, an enhancer is a short (50–1500 bp) region of DNA that can be bound by proteins (activators) to increase the likelihood that transcription of a particular gene will occur.
_	1983 was also the year it became clear that HIV was not only a target for what was known as the 4Hs, homosexuals, hemophiliacs, Haitians and heroin addicts, but that HIV was also targeting heterosexuals — making the likelihood that the HIV related disease, AIDS, was an epidemic very high.
_	The same study found that releasing prisoners to parole supervision both reduces the likelihood that they will engage in substance use and makes it easier for them to find employment after release.
_	The Court ruled on the admissibility of clinical opinions given by two psychiatrists hired by the prosecution in answer to hypothetical questions regarding the defendant's future dangerousness and the likelihood that he would present a continuing threat to society in this Texas death penalty case.
_	The FTC held a workshop on debt negotiation/settlement last fall, and similar concerns were expressed as to how the industry operates and the likelihood that debt negotiation/settlement benefits a significant number of consumers."
_	The form "Oruansei" also confirms the likelihood that the name refers to this being a tidal island, which it is.
_	This is important to keep in mind because VRACs are not the only molecules present that aid in cell volume regulation, and recent research has shown that the likelihood that these two channels work cooperatively is high.
_	In order to respond quickly, certain actions, such as attack and blocking resolution, are permuted and evaluated (a considerably fast process), and then are sorted in order; the computer then proceeds the lookahead from each option, in order, with the likelihood that if the computer should run out of time, one of the high scoring options will produce the best possible result.
_	It is even more impossible now with the likelihood that Lipotes vexillfer may be the first cetacean to have been driven to extinction by human activity.
_	The results of a study from Gonzaga University comparing the results in Washington state between the 2004 (closed) and 2008 (top two) primaries, indicate that the top two primary overall reduced the likelihood of running against a same party candidate and it reduced the likelihood that a strong incumbent would face a challenger from his or her own party.
_	A history of substance of abuse in the mother before the birth increases the likelihood that the infant will develop symptoms of withdrawal.
_	Sometime before 1894, enterprising petroleum prospectors recognized the likelihood that economically viable deposits of oil and gas were the source for these seeps, and began digging.
_	From here, the anti-male bodies would then cross the blood/brain barrier (BBB) of the developing fetal brain, altering sex-dimorphic brain structures relative to sexual orientation, increasing the likelihood that the exposed son will be more attracted to men than women.
_	The three opposition parties planned to table a motion of non-confidence in the House of Commons, and counted on the likelihood that the Governor General, Michaëlle Jean, would invite the coalition to govern instead of dissolving parliament and calling an election so soon after the last election.
_	This leaves open the likelihood that other nuclear-armed countries might mistake it for a nuclear launch which could provoke a counterattack.
_	The book is broken down into three sections that focus first on the importance of building trust among the various constituencies in schools, then the challenge or threat that high-stakes standardized testing presents to building trust in schools, and finally, a broader vision for how particular systemic and policy changes could be made to increase the likelihood that schools build the trust that is necessary for schools to be effective.
_	This, and the likelihood that he had little personal reason to fake his private diary, leaves little doubt about its accuracy – it is very widely accepted that they did indeed reach the top of Annapurna.
_	Each point in the mesh is assigned a weight, indicating the likelihood that the point contains writing.
_	An activation map is a representation of visual space in which the level of activation at a location reflects the likelihood that the location contains a target.
_	Thus, people can overestimate the likelihood that something has a very rare property, or underestimate the likelihood of a very common property.
_	Secondly, joining the weaker side increases the likelihood that the new member will be influential within the alliance.
_	This increases the likelihood that larger males will displace attending, smaller males.
_	The second chick may hatch three to five days later and a longer delay increases the likelihood that it will die of starvation.
_	This acreage was sold by the state on a first-come, first-served basis with the county advertising the availability of land, which resulted in extremely long lines at the county clerks' offices and increased the likelihood that the desired acreage would not be available.
_	Glass referred to the work as a "pocket opera" and deliberately chose the small-scale format of a chamber opera to increase the likelihood that it would be frequently performed.
_	The result is effectively increasing the likelihood that a visit to the site will lead to a visit to the park and ultimately to a positive impact on health.
_	They discuss the likelihood that Mona had been working with someone else.
_	Risk is the likelihood that something bad will happen that causes harm to an informational asset (or the loss of the asset).
_	There are several plausible reasons for his denials, including the likelihood that he wanted to protect family and friends from reprisals for his incendiary political writings.
_	While the project has formally ended, the benefits of using broadly available fonts remain: to increase the likelihood that content will be displayed in the chosen font, or in a metric-compatible alternative.
_	This increases the likelihood that the investors will receive cash flows to which they are entitled, causing the securities to have higher credit ratings than the originators.
_	He was sceptical about the new party, and scorned the likelihood that it could switch the allegiance of the working class from sport to politics.
_	The Glasgow-Blatchford bleeding score (GBS) is a screening tool to assess the likelihood that a patient with an acute upper gastrointestinal bleeding (UGIB) will need to have medical intervention such as a blood transfusion or endoscopic intervention.
_	Despite these reports, the Intelligence Community did not produce any assessments of the likelihood that terrorists would use planes as weapons, and U.S. policymakers apparently remained unaware of this kind of potential threat."
_	While many naturalists were simply drawn to the exotic nature of the tropics, some historians argue that the naturalists conducted their studies on tropical islands in order to increase the likelihood that their work might bring about social and political change.
_	The presence of automatic aids, as one source puts it, "diminishes the likelihood that decision makers will either make the cognitive effort to seek other diagnostic information or process all available information in cognitively complex ways."
_	As Rae argued and Taylor proved in 1969, majority rule is the rule that maximizes the likelihood that the issues a voter votes for will pass and that the issues a voter votes against will fail.
_	Involving the stakeholders in message and materials development increases the likelihood that the communication program would help achieve the bigger development goals.
_	The coverup evidently succeeded to the extent that the likelihood that she was murdered was largely overlooked by historians and commentators until the 1980s.
_	A press release from the governor's office stated, ""[A]n overwhelming body of evidence indicates the 23-year-old Arridy was innocent, including false and coerced confessions, the likelihood that Arridy was not in Pueblo at the time of the killing, and an admission of guilt by someone else.""
_	In other words, trait relevance determines if a situation offers the opportunity (based on task, social, and/or organizational cues) to express a certain trait, and the strength of the situation determines the likelihood that individuals will express the relevant trait or not.
_	Malone took part in a confidential mission, traveling to Mexico disguised as journalists to assess the likelihood that Francisco I. Madero could remain in power if he won the presidency in the 1912 election.
_	The use of corporal punishment by parents increases the likelihood that children will suffer physical abuse, and most documented cases of physical abuse in Canada and the United States begin as disciplinary spankings.
_	At least one reliable source, "The Economist", recognized the likelihood that Brown was "pushed" out by the administration rather than having resigned voluntarily, although internal e-mails from Brown indicated that he was already planning to leave FEMA at the time Katrina hit.
_	Far more certain, however, is the likelihood that as a result of the principles enunciated by the "Revlon" decision, practitioners can be assured that cash mergers and change of control transactions will engender far closer judicial scrutiny than the broad judicial deference that had been previously regarded as typical and appropriate, as will a board's approval of provisions in merger agreements that unduly restrict the board's ability to entertain more lucrative offers that appear between signing of the merger agreement and its presentation for approval of shareholders.
_	Biologically females tend to select mates "who are most likely to secure offspring survival and thus increase the likelihood that her genetic contribution will be reproductively viable."
_	This is because the likelihood that adverse effects to an organism will be realized is dependent on the concentration of that substance in the target tissues of the organism, the physicochemical properties of that chemical and the duration of exposure to the organism.
_	If the nuc is to be given a new queen, the queen will be introduced to the colony in her queen cage either at the time the nuc is split from the main colony, or after a period of queenlessness that increases the likelihood that the new queen will be accepted.
_	Once the spearhead had penetrated an enemy's body, the barb caused much difficulty in removing the weapon, thus increasing the likelihood that the pierced individual would die as a result of the wound.
_	Polyculture, the mixing of different crops, reduces the likelihood that one or more of the crops will be resistant to any particular pathogen.
_	The new amendment, Supplementary Standard SB-13, "Glass in Guards" is intended to help minimize the likelihood that balcony glass will break on newly constructed buildings and help reduce the chance of broken pieces falling to the ground below if balcony glass does break.
_	The previous generation IS 430 prototype vehicle was indicative of future possibilities for the IS series, including the likelihood that a second generation high-performance IS model could come equipped with a V8 engine.
_	The groups operating the large detectors in the collider said that the likelihood that their signal was a result of a chance fluctuation was less than one chance in 3.5 million, so-called "five sigma," which is the gold standard in physics for a discovery.
_	He notes, however, that the SEC permits the practice because it sustained competitors to the NYSE and reduces the likelihood that NYSE specialists will obtain monopoly power.
_	According to "Australian Aviation", continuing delays to the F-35 program have increased the likelihood that the Super Hornets of Nos. 1 and 6 Squadrons will, rather than being disposed of early as originally planned, continue to be operated by the RAAF for their full service life of over 20 years.
_	In 1999 a Brisbane tabloid, the Sunday Mail interviewed Groenveld on the likelihood that more destructive cults would show up in Australia during 1999 before the new Millennium.
_	Some countries also have laws prohibiting condom possession; this reduces the likelihood that sex workers will use condoms.
_	They may be divided into stable versus unstable depending on the likelihood that they may shift further.
_	Exposure is the likelihood that a minority and a majority party will come in contact with one another.
_	This reduces the likelihood that the call has to be repeated on alternate frequencies.
_	This along with other research has led many academics, systems administrators, and policymakers to focus on the importance of childhood sexual abuse, specifically on the role this abuse plays in increasing the likelihood that girls will be involved in the juvenile justice system, will be re-traumatized by experiences within the system, and will be more likely to recidivate and continue a cycle of criminal justice involvement.
_	Though Vesalius' work was not the first such work based on actual dissection, nor even the first work of this era, the production quality, highly detailed and intricate plates, and the likelihood that the artists who produced it were clearly present in person at the dissections made it an instant classic.
_	Combination therapy decreases the likelihood that drug resistance will occur, because it is unlikely that the HIV-1 strains will be able to mutate enough to become resistant to all drugs being used in the combination.
_	Highly leveraged agents can potentially become indispensable to the economy if the failure of an extremely leveraged agent increases the likelihood that other leveraged agents will have to follow suit.
_	The factors that the board would consider in the determination of "unfitness for service" would "include, but not be limited to: (1) the likelihood that the activity or conduct may adversely affect students or other employees; (2) the proximity or remoteness in time or location of the conduct to the employee's responsibilities; (3) the extenuating or aggravating circumstances which, in the judgment of the board, must be examined in weighing the evidence; and (4) whether the conduct included acts, words or deeds, of a continuing or comprehensive nature which would tend to encourage, promote or dispose schoolchildren toward private or public homosexual activity or private or public homosexual conduct."
_	Certain factors appear to increase the likelihood that a woman will naturally conceive multiples.
_	Though they are currently placed in the same genus, Dr. Poinar notes the likelihood that the two species arose interdependently from each other.
_	Practitioners are trained to carry out an interview which identifies a number of risk factors which, when present, increase the likelihood that an individual may suffer poor longer term mental health as a result of a traumatic event.
_	In order to determine the required size of pipe, an arbitrary unit is used for pipe sizing which takes into account the likelihood that all the fixtures will not be used at the same time.
_	has recently made observations on the likelihood that chacanus is the correct, i.e. original term.
_	Thus, this interpretation significantly lowers the likelihood that "Tasmaniosaurus" or its relatives (such as proterosuchids) were mainly aquatic.
_	"Mr.Smith" explains that his mission is to warn humanity of the likelihood that Earth's orbit will be destabilized should the magnetic experiments continue.
_	Despite the results of the phylogenetic analysis, ""A." germanicus" is an unlikely candidate for the ancestor of mekosuchines because it lived very far from Australia and the likelihood that it could have reached Australia from Europe is very low.
_	Rather, the new particle is "possibly" a Higgs boson, and so far as early results allow it "behaves quite like" a Higgs boson is expected to behave, but further tests are required to examine the likelihood that it is indeed a Higgs boson.
_	While the first Royal Commission considered the likelihood that the code phrase "foxtrot corpen" was reversed to become "corpen foxtrot" (an order to turn onto the given course), Frame states that it was more likely that the numbers given for the course were misheard or confused with other numbers in the signal as a turn to the south-west (various possibilities offered by Frame would have indicated a turn to the south-west instead of the north-east, with an incorrect heading between 200° and 220°, or of 270°), or that this happened in conjunction with the code phrase error.
_	"During the coming year [1968], the president was expected to seek reelection, which increased the likelihood that the presidential campaign would become a referendum on American policy in Vietnam.
_	Choy also reports that the likelihood that a students will enroll in a four-year higher education institution is highly correlated with taking more advanced math courses in high school.
_	This relatively “hands-off” management, combined with the increased on-farm heterogeneity created by the establishment of cover crops, increases the likelihood that a more complex trophic structure will develop to support a higher level of wildlife diversity (Freemark and Kirk 2001).
_	O'Shea has stated that, given the available evidence, the highest upper bound he would consider plausible for the giant squid's total length would be , and that the likelihood that there exist 20-metre giant squid is "so exceedingly remote that you couldn't justify the effort in writing about it" (Bittel, 2016).
_	Sexual orientation does not affect the likelihood that people will abuse children.
_	This argument had been previously made by Dick Morris to suggest the likelihood that undecided voters would overwhelmingly vote for John McCain:
_	Meanwhile, as the Tang generals began to gather their forces to force Huang Chao out of Chang'an, Zhao Chou began to anticipate the likelihood that Huang, who had by that point claimed the title of Emperor of Qi but who was suffering defeats at Tang generals' hands, would abandon Chang'an and head east, particularly since Huang bore particular resentment to Zhongwu Circuit due to the prior engagements that he had with the Zhongwu army.
_	A dozen or more detectors may be connected via wiring or wirelessly such that if one detects smoke, the alarms will sound on all the detectors in the network, improving the likelihood that occupants will be alerted even if smoke is detected far from their location.
_	The term comes from the likelihood that when playing on more difficult courses, players' scores will rise more quickly than their handicaps would predict.
_	He is also notable for the likelihood that he will be the first inmate executed by the state of Nevada in over a decade.
_	The Mars Society temporarily renamed their Mars Desert Research Station “Colbert” for one week in April, citing the likelihood that Node 3 would not be given that name in a press release.
_	This increases the likelihood that an attacker succeeds with a brute-force attack.
_	In species with external fertilization and male parental care, females are able to distribute her clutch amongst different males and by doing so the female increases the likelihood that at least some of her offspring will receive indirect genetic benefits and/or extensive parental care from a quality provider.
_	This explanation can help keep the child safe because instilling that alarm creates greater awareness and lessens the likelihood that they will wander alone into trouble.
_	The decision by the Ontario Government not to appeal to the Supreme Court was based on the likelihood that the court would not grant leave.
_	However, the likelihood that a person will develop PTE is influenced by the severity and type of injury; for example penetrating injuries and those that involve bleeding within the brain confer a higher risk.
_	for medical professionals to assess the likelihood that a victim will become pregnant in their assessment of the physical damage done to the woman.
_	The curve plotted "intergenerational income elasticity" – i.e. the likelihood that someone will inherit their parents' relative position of income level – and inequality for a number of countries.
_	Most scholars, however, focus on the high degree of shared terminology and legal rulings between the Damascus Document and the Community Rule, including terms like "sons of light", and their penal codes and on the likelihood that fragment 4Q265 is a hybrid edition of both documents.
_	In fact, studies have shown that simply instructing a witness that the perpetrator "may or may not be present" in the lineup can dramatically reduce the likelihood that a witness will identify an innocent person.
_	Furthermore, Swearer, et al. (2010) discuss a "dosage effect" in which the more positive and consistent elements included in a program, the more the likelihood that bullying would decrease.
_	It examines the likelihood that Russia would follow the same path as Weimar Germany.
_	Because of this, there is concern that alcohol exclusion laws help drunken drivers avoid detection and increase the likelihood that they will repeat their crime in the future.
_	These plumes are not necessary for chick viability, but increased chick ornamentation increases the likelihood that a chick will be chosen as a favorite by the parents.
_	Mindful of the likelihood that impeachment will fail, he urged lawmakers to "struggle to find a suitable means to express your sense of disappointment."
_	The curve relates intergenerational income elasticity—i.e. the likelihood that someone will inherit their parents' relative position of income level—and inequality in the United States and twelve other developed countries, though some versions of the curve include developing countries.
_	As a consequence, database marketers also tend to be heavy users of data warehouses, because having a greater amount of data about customers increases the likelihood that a more accurate model can be built.
_	Anticipating Wells' intention and even warning his players against the likelihood that Wells would attempt a dunk, Bud Francis stationed a team staffer with a camera on the east side of the armory.
_	The PageRank algorithm outputs a probability distribution used to represent the likelihood that a person randomly clicking on links will arrive at any particular page.
_	al. find that peer cheating increases the likelihood that an individual will cheat.
_	"Safety" looks at reducing the likelihood that patients are harmed by medical errors.
_	At this point, Gospatric, who had a plausible claim to the Earldom given the likelihood that he was related to Oswulf and Uchtred, offered King William a large amount of money to be given the Earldom of Bernicia.
_	Though the term “effect” is crucial for determining the likelihood that a rule is economically significant, the term was not internally defined.
_	The likelihood of a security incident occurrence is a function of the likelihood that a threat appears and the likelihood that the threat can successfully exploit the relevant system vulnerabilities.
_	Researchers and writers, such as Camburn and Han(2009), have also remarked that widespread leadership promotes teachers exposure to plentiful instructional resources and the likelihood that they will employ these instruction practices.
_	The criteria to determine the group includes the level of risk to the health of a person or to public health, as well as the likelihood that the human pathogen will actually cause disease in a human, and whether treatment and preventative measures are available.
_	After the drow retreat from their assault on Mithral Hall, due to the instability that would likely plague House Baenre after the disastrous failed conquest of Mithral Hall (and the likelihood that Triel would soon give birth to a son she would groom to replace Berg'inyon as the weapons master, which among the drow would likely mean Berg'inyon's death), Berg'inyon chooses to accept Jarlaxle's offer to join Bregan D'aerthe as a lieutenant of the renegade drow band.
_	However, in a study conducted by Shelby et al. (2010), female leadership advantage was investigated by specifying contextual factors that moderate the likelihood that such an advantage would emerge.
_	To help solve this problem, many cladogram algorithms use a simulated annealing approach to increase the likelihood that the selected cladogram is the optimal one.
_	He misses Dot and laments that his art has alienated him from those important to him, but resigns himself to the likelihood that creative fulfillment may always take precedence for him over personal happiness ("Finishing the Hat").
_	When people are asked to estimate the likelihood that a statement is true, they search their memory for information that has implications for the validity of this statement.
_	Once this information has been identified, they estimate a) the likelihood that the statement would be true if the information were true, and b) the likelihood that the statement would be true if the information were false.
_	If their estimates for these two probabilities differ, people average them, weighting each by the likelihood that the information is true and false (respectively).
_	In the course of the Israeli–Palestinian conflict, the Israel Defense Forces (IDF) employed what they call "focused foiling" ( ""), or targeted killing, against those suspected by Israel of intending to perform a specific act of violence in the very near future, or to be linked indirectly with several acts of violence (organizing, planning, researching means of destruction, etc.), thus raising the likelihood that his or her killing would foil similar activities in the future.
_	The more coarse the lock, the higher the likelihood that the lock will stop an unrelated process from proceeding.
_	At the time, making good on a purchase promise required a transaction at the associated clerk's office, and on the day it was due the brokers gathered at the Erie Railroad Company clerk's office, smug at the likelihood that they had beaten Little at his own game.
_	Individuals’ perceptions of the availability of resources may lead to increased beliefs of the likelihood that the ideas they generate have a possibility of reaching the implementation stage.
_	There are certain situations which heighten the likelihood that a person will engage in social tuning, for example when an individual wants to be liked by another or when an individual does not already hold strong opinions on a subject.
_	The posterior probability is the likelihood that the parameter is correct given the observed data or samples statistics.
_	Some of the scientists pursue a theory that the neutrino signal might have had the effect of increasing the likelihood that life would develop on the planet eons ago.
_	The foundation cites the likelihood that a being developed enough to find and read the information would already possess significant technology as the reason for not prioritizing scientific data sets.
_	However, in an effort to reduce the likelihood that a team would be eliminated on statistical tiebreakers, the tournament schedule allowed for a seventh game at each pool-play site.
_	Disrupting the couple by saying "800 pennies" instead of "8 dollars", the waiter is able to increase the likelihood that they will buy the steak dinner.
_	Author David J. Hughes in his 2004 book entitled "North America’s Natural Gas Crisis", predicted that the Western Canada Sedimentary Basin would likely continue to be the main gas supply area in Canada for many years, however, declining production and the likelihood that much of the gas will be diverted to fuel new oil sands plants mean that the probability of there being sufficient surplus gas to meet projected U.S. demand is low, and the US will have to look elsewhere for future gas supplies.
_	Research has also shown that the presence of an existing eating disorder increases the likelihood that an individual will engage in emotional eating.
_	The other factor which few of these researchers have considered is the likelihood that Aboriginal population density increased rapidly and dramatically over the last 5–10,000 years.
_	By placing the large buy orders, Mr. Coscia and Panther sought to give the market the impression that there was significant buying interest, which suggested that prices would soon rise, raising the likelihood that other market participants would buy from the small order Coscia and Panther were then offering to sell."
_	Anatomical hemispherectomy decreases the likelihood that seizures will return, as there is no longer any part of the identified epileptic brain area left to cause seizures.
_	Meteorologists use radiosondes to measure the environmental lapse rate and compare it to the predicted adiabatic lapse rate to forecast the likelihood that air will rise.
_	Debate around the issue at the time focused on the likelihood that the legislation would push jobs out of Ohio.
_	When every missile carried only one poorly guided warhead designing systems with massive warhead yields in order to cause a huge damage footprint, with the possibility of potentially destroying several nearby soft targets of opportunity, while also increasing the likelihood that the primary target was within the overlap of CEP and destruction circle the highest possible yield warhead for the missile was considered an advantage.
_	There are four doors within the structure (south, north, northeast and west), with the likelihood that six doors or passageways provided access to the courtyard between the fortifications inner and outer walls.
_	Incorrect assumptions about false rape allegations increases the likelihood that a person who reports rape will be blamed or disbelieved.
_	Proponents believed that if the proposition is accepted in California, it would increase the likelihood that other states will also adopt the same rules.
_	Polanyi's PhD studies at Manchester University focused on measuring the strengths of chemical bonds using thermal dissociation, building on Warhurst's graduate studies using a sodium flame apparatus to determine the likelihood that a collision between a sodium atom and another molecule would lead to a chemical reaction.
_	Larger EPSPs result in greater membrane depolarization and thus increase the likelihood that the postsynaptic cell reaches the threshold for firing an action potential.
_	With a combined assessment, you’ll gain a thorough understanding of the vulnerabilities & threats that exist in your environment and the likelihood that they will be exploited and impact your organization.
_	They discussed the likelihood that string theory and other theories that have yet to show empirical data will eventually be proved.
_	Traditionally, one of the main roles of advertising and promotion was to increase the likelihood that a brand name was included in the consumer's evoked set.
_	A new name is considered for its compatibility with Icelandic tradition and for the likelihood that it might cause the bearer embarrassment.
_	The familiarity heuristic increases the likelihood that customers will repeatedly buy products of the same brand.
_	However, integument has also been discovered on at least three ornithischians, raising the likelihood that proto-feathers were also present in earlier dinosaurs.
_	This increases the likelihood that the offender's time with the child is welcomed and encouraged".
_	Furthermore, due to the likelihood that NSS predated 'The Welsh Embassador’ of 1623/4, a last possible date for the writing of NSS can also be deduced and a composition date of around 1622 can be established with some certainty.
_	His writings focus on praising the Soviet Union and its political and economic system from a Russian nationalist perspective, criticizing the Russian government, and discussing the perceived NATO (particularly American) threat to Russia and the likelihood that this antagonism will result in a nuclear war between Russia and NATO.
_	The following week, several Russian newspapers reported that a worsening security situation in Chechnya was lessening the likelihood that Kadyrov would replace Alu Alkhanov as the republic's president.
_	Papillons make excellent family dogs, but should be watched around little children, as should any dog, due to a small child's lack of understanding of a dog's behavior and the likelihood that they will do something to upset the dog.
_	Interruption of a column's front-to-rear line of sight increased the likelihood that the head and tail of the column would split and try to fight separately.
_	On a scale from 1(likely) to 7(unlikely), participants rated the likelihood that members of their own sex would perform each act.
_	Sexual orientation does not affect the likelihood that people will abuse children.
_	The use of fruit as bait reduces the likelihood that a pet, such as a cat, will be caught.
_	There is also an alteration to the primary gameplay and controls: the player can now manually advance the blocks down the screen in order to heighten the difficulty and pace of a level, and thereby increase the likelihood that they will acquire a card.
_	Differences in individuals' propensity for self-monitoring have a heritable component, but the likelihood that a person becomes a high (or low) self-monitor also varies between social contexts and groups.
_	The completion of one test increases the likelihood that the suspect will participate in follow-up FSTs.
_	It included six chansons attributed to Josquin, each with a different spelling of his name, suggesting that the copyist was not aware of Josquin prior to this, lessening the likelihood that the chanson was mistakenly attributed to Josquin.
_	To reduce the likelihood that the synephrine detected in urine had a dietary origin, the subjects tested by Ibrahim and co-workers abstained from the consumption of any citrus products for 48 hours prior to providing urine samples.
_	In July 1983, the Bureau of Air Safety Investigation asked the Royal Australian Navy Research Laboratory (RANRL) about the likelihood that the cowl flap might have "travelled" to its ultimate position from the region where the aircraft disappeared.
_	Firstly, if the shingle is too coarse, the amount of fine sediment that can remain between the spaces is reduced, and the likelihood that seeds will germinate and grow upwards is low.
_	Forced sex work increases the likelihood that a sex worker will contract HIV/AIDS or another sexually transmitted infection, particularly when an individual enters sex work before the age of 18.
_	Cooper and Wolthausen developed equations indicating that the optimal shelf-reading interval is a function of the number of books in a section, the likelihood that a book in one section will migrate to another, checking and users costs, and the error rate of the shelf reader.
_	The process of EA is thought to be maintained through negative reinforcement—that is, short-term relief of discomfort is achieved through avoidance, thereby increasing the likelihood that the behavior will persist.
_	A number of measures have been taken to reduce the likelihood that workers in at-risk industries—such as coal mining, construction, and stonemasonry—will develop COPD.
_	Indeed, flat setups are quick save for the likelihood that they will be heavier and the two standard central wheels tend to 'bite' when grinding.
_	To reduce the likelihood that youth will engage in ATOD, the kiR lessons include personal stories and language that youth find familiar, along with teaching effective risk assessment, decision making, communication, and life skills including the REAL strategies.
_	Attorney Marc Bennett said that prosecutors made the decision not to convene a new jury or ask for the reinstatement of the "hard 50", because of Roeder's age, his worsening health, and the likelihood that he will die in prison before the 25 years pass.
_	Among the arguments made in fighting the appeal was the likelihood that he would be denied access to cannabis in custody and risk death from his illness.
_	The data shows that the program, in terms of overall poverty, created the greatest improvement in reducing the share of families living in severe poverty from 30% to 17%, and increased the likelihood that parents had bank accounts.
_	MDOT also used a new technique to recess the pavement markings into the concrete, designed to reduce the likelihood that snowplows would scrape them off.
_	Conclusions about the cause of the disease are based upon the likelihood that a patient came in contact with a particular agent, the presence of a microbe in a community, and other epidemiological considerations.
_	According to RTD (2012), when new development occurs near stations, it increases the likelihood that residents and workers will choose transit as their transportation mode.
_	He is the founder of the Mitchell Institute, in Portland, Maine, whose mission is to increase the likelihood that young people from every community in Maine will aspire to, pursue and achieve a college education.
_	By demanding that a country show its commitment to freedom and economic development, the MCA has greatly improved the likelihood that its aid is not squandered on wasteful and unproductive projects.
_	Because the captain doubted the validity of the visas, he required that many passengers also buy return tickets on the likelihood that no country would admit them.
_	Web-safe fonts are fonts likely to be present on a wide range of computer systems, and used by Web content authors to increase the likelihood that content displays in their chosen font.
_	Alternatively, others such as Kevin Warwick argue for the likelihood that both humans and posthumans will continue to exist but the latter will predominate in society over the former because of their abilities.
_	The overall preservation as well as palaeographic and orthographic evidence shows the likelihood that these fragments really do belong together.
_	Such a phalanx formation also reduced the likelihood that battles would degenerate into a pushing match.
_	The purpose of limiting the testing to high-risk people is to increase the likelihood that the person will receive a meaningful, actionable result from the test, rather than identifying a variant of unknown significance (VUS).
_	A further unfortunate consideration has to be made into the likelihood that the cricket nets will be subject to misuse or vandalism.
_	The more factors that are present, the greater the likelihood that the horse will develop ER.
_	To simplify the analytical process for their customers, the different consumer reporting agencies can apply a mathematical algorithm to provide a score the customer can use to more rapidly assess the likelihood that an individual will repay a particular debt given the frequency that other individuals in similar situations have defaulted.
_	A golfer's performances can be quite variable from one round to the next, and playing an extra round increases the likelihood that the senior majors will be won by leading players.
_	This makes the likelihood that gene function is lost over time (i.e. pseudogenization) far greater than the likelihood of the emergence of a new gene function.
_	One researcher states how attractive neighborhoods contribute to positive attitudes and social norms that encourage walking, while having close access to recreational facilities such as parks increases the likelihood that people will translate walking intentions into actual action.
_	The importance of the area is due in part to the relevance for creditors and investors in evaluating the likelihood that a firm may go bankrupt.
_	Other studies found that free samples decreased the likelihood that physicians would follow standard of care practices.
_	This reduces the likelihood that the threads will be stripped during equipment installation and removal.
_	The two properties that characterize all addictive stimuli are that they are reinforcing (i.e., they increase the likelihood that a person will seek repeated exposure to them) and intrinsically rewarding (i.e., they are perceived as being inherently positive, desirable, and pleasurable).
_	With the likelihood that the company would have to undergo a hearing by the FCC Commissioner's Board regarding the issue, Pan Pacific also realized that the station was ripe for a possible takeover by other prospective licensees, citing a federal law that permitted minority-owned firms to be able to purchase local broadcast media properties that were under FCC investigation at a discount bid.
_	If this individual experiences minimal or no negative consequences (punishment), then the likelihood that the behavior will reoccur is increased.
_	However, the likelihood that someone will stick to a certain treatment varied, with compliance being the highest with nicotine patches, followed by nicotine gum, inhalers, and nasal sprays.
_	As they begin the expedition, Briggs is sent to scout and when contact is lost they decide to press on in the likelihood that it's simply an equipment malfunction.
